The event was truly spectacular and we at Sareez are as proud of Sachin Tendulakar as the rest of the country. A big congratulations to him from the Sareez team and heres hoping that he gives us more reasons to celebrate in the coming times.
If you participate in 4 or all 5 shares shipping will be $4.95.
I said earlier that there’s a sort of symbiotic relationship that exists between singing and warfare — that the two help feed each other — and I said that singing certain kinds of songs can help strengthen and sustain Christian soldiers in their fight.
The latest item I am so geeked to bring to my store, is a new range of soap gift packs I'm calling TRIOS. As the name slaps you over the head with - they will be cute gift packs of three goat milk soaps, all featuring a theme. I'm beginning with the seasons and running with it from there. The possibilities are endless. Just choosing suppliers and boxes was enough to make my eyeballs melt. My initial gift pack is for (what else?) spring. It's wishful soaping, ya'll. If I never see another flake of snow, it'll be too soon.
04 A Night in Tunisia (Gillespie, Paparelli) 5:57
Hofbrau Maibock
Me - Remember your old favorite preschool teacher? She had a tattoo and you didn't think she was scary.
John B. Gable
Was Edward Foster senior ever land steward to Sir Robert Burdett, 4th Baronet, of Foremark Hall, Derbyshire? After all, the dates seem to fit, and Foremarke Hall is only four miles to the east of Egginton. I believe he was probably born in nearby Doveridge in 1748, so would have been in his mid-20s by the time Edward junior was born. In 1791, Burdett's land steward in Foremark was Robert C. Greaves, Esq. (Universal British Directory, 1791), and by 1821-22 William Crabtree was performing that duty (Pigot's Derbyshire Directory, 1821-1822). However, Foster's father may well have been the incumbent at some other time between those dates. This awaits further research, perhaps in the extensive collection of Burdett papers at the Derbyshire Record Office. A quick look at the catalogue contents, for example, reveals the names of further agents John Brand (1783), Benjamin Redfern (1783-1789) and Robert Banton (1808-1816), but no sign of Foster.
I would like to think that at the end of my life, I made a little difference in their lives.
"Uh, sure. That one seems to be moving, though," I said.
(1910). He is regarded as a major "innovator in the art of the short story"; his children's books are enduring classics of children's literature; and his best works are said to exhibit "a versatile and luminous narrative gift".
If you’re having trouble creating your Free Report, just sit down & ask yourself, “What are the top 10 questions I get from my current customers?” You can narrow it down quickly, just by doing that simple exercise.
Try telling that to a four going on five-year-0ld. She immediately proceeded to jump up and about and swat at me like my life depended on it, because in her wonderful, glimmering, still hopeful hazel eyes I was being consumed by fire ants and was nearing the end of my life. Her words not mine. Well I alliterated, her words were, “Get them off! Get them off! If they eat you they will drag you into their fire ant hole and you will die!” She said that while jumping higher than our cats and beating at my legs (and she hits pretty hard). At one point she decided to dig a little deep and get into a perfectly cute zone of inner-being and let out a confounded, “hiyah!” Karate never looked so hilarious, and had there been actual ants in my pants, I’m sure they would have surrendered at her sheer determination alone.
Businesses would prefer to give an employee a raise and add more tasks to the employees job scope than pay a minimum wage and be faced with arbitrary pay increases each time the government changes the law.
The best known attempt to measure moral development is of course that by Kohlberg -- which took the Piagetian approach of watching how children's moral ideas develop. Kohlberg's two "highest" levels of moral development were not however based on observation but rather on Kohlbeg's own liberal ideas. As such they are just an expression of opinion and are not in any way authoriative.
When you factor in households, the Cavaliers drop to 8th nationwide (131,000) - considering that huge markets like New York City have many more TV households than Cleveland, which catapults the New York Yankees to the top of the households list.
Unfortunately, that night, there was no official present to protest that what the murderer was doing was wrong and unfair. No one beside Yeardley objected, because she was alone against a man strengthened by jealous rage and alcohol. He had already choked her once in the past – that time, he had been pulled off her by another male lacrosse player. Yeardley would have known what was likely to happen once her neck was in his grip. Except that she probably thought she would survive.
But I don’t hang out with them because they’re gay. How shallow and hollow would that be?
Hal, continuing directly:
Your black dinner jacket
moment. Water filled the moat, and I heard laughter from a bungalow perched
“To the average reader, Puck and Bottom are probably the most memorable characters in the play, Bottom especially. This instinct is right. Bottom is as much the master-character here as Launce is in The Two Gentlemen of Verona. Bottom symbolizes the earthy, the ponderous, the slow, in contrast with Puck, who is all that is quick, light, and aerial. Bottom is substance, the real in the common acceptance of that term. If Puck is the apex, Bottom is the base without whose four-square foundation the pyramid of life would topple over. He is the antithesis of the thesis of the play, the ballast that keeps the elfin bark of it from capsizing. He is literally what goes to the bottom. Like all heavy things he is content with his place in life, but his egotism is the unconscious selfishness of a child, both a sense and a consequence of his own individuality, not greed but pride in the good significance of that word. His realistic conception of stagecraft is in character. To Puck, Bottom is an ass. Yet Titania falls in love with him, ass’s head and all.
Captain J Smith went down with the ship so did Thomas Andrews and most of the Titanic’s crew. As the story goes, the magnitude of the cross culture, which was practiced onboard, was cast aside at the instant of the tragedy. First class passengers especially the men were helping the children and women of third class into the boats. This includes John Jacob Astor who was the wealthiest man onboard the Titanic whose net worth is estimated at $2.8 billion dollars as per 2012. After helping his 19-year-old pregnant wife into the lifeboat, he wasted no time in helping the rest of the passengers. Many first class passengers who were portrayed as arrogant self-righteous kind of people became the true heroes of the night. Captain Smith and Andrews were also seen on the boat loading decks helping as many women and children into the boats and risked their lives as they died with the Titanic.
Keep looking, I know I did and I STILL didn't see it.
So, without further fuss, read on for my very easy pantry-ready Chicken and Corn Soup…
It is a one-layer card with a round aperture on the front. The heart is inside the card, and is die-cut using PTI's Heart dies. I used Tiny Tags dies and Tiny Tags II stamps. I also used, Think Big Favorites #11 and Tag Its #11.
I also squeezed in Mitch Albom's book Have A Little Faith, a very small, quick read. I am a bit fascinated with religion, comparative religion and spiritual journeys. I must be on one myself, but haven't quite figured it out yet.
You’re probably thinking, why would I want to do exercise? Well there is no doubt that if you consider how it can help your body you will probably be running down to the shops by the end of this article! Doing exercise during pregnancy can help in various different ways. You’ve probably read some horror stories about women in labour, but it is proven that doing some slight exercise throughout your pregnancy can benefit you when you reach this stage. Making your more flexible and doing some stretches can aid any problems with pushing during labour, and doing slight exercise will also give you more stamina. More stamina is a bonus for anyone in labour, we all know how tough it can be, so that little bit of extra effort you can put in at the birth could be really important. And for the sake of 30
*Matches and lighters
Step 3: Apply concealer to cover up any dark circles or eye puffiness
In use KERS can be used in several different ways. When lapping alone KERS typically gains 0.45s per lap, although this varies slightly by track. Along with DRS is can boost top speed by 12kmh. As explained the driver uses a pre-agreed amount of boost, decided from simulation work done at the factory before the race. So the planned strategy of KERS usage will be used in practice, qualifying and in parts of the race. However in the race the driver can use KERS tactically to gain an advantage. Drivers are able to use more a KERS boost to either overtake or defend a position. One feature of 2011 along with the Pirelli tyres being in different condition during the race, was the driver’s freedom to alter their racing line and use their grip and KERS to tackle their rivals.
Turn out bad.
This is a horrible picture taken spur of the moment at 6am on a dark rainy day without a flash with my phone.
As Chris Lohring tweeted later that evening: "After a heated debate @NERAX on #sessionbeer price, taste and ABV, selling the hell out of Notch at 8.99 a six pack at an in-store tasting." The people have spoken. For the record, I was drinking the new Notch Pilsner at Deep Ellum the day before. And it was delicious.
The Coup has been met with opposition from civilians inside the country. Organisations such as the UN have also been calling for a return of power to the democratically elected leader. The CNRDR on the other hand do have some support. Pro-junta demonstrations were held yesterday throughout the streets of Bamako in support of the ousting of President Toure. What will happen next seems unclear.
In October 2010, Christensen and Brill came up with a project for 24-Hour Comics Day, a comic industry activity where creators design a whole comic in a single day. Because of the rash of teen suicides due to anti-gay bullying last fall, they decided to focus on the issue of bullying. The Power Within is the story of Shannon,
I wanna smash that faerie O ‘Thief
There’s something about Richmond that always makes it a great race. In fact, it’s on my list of tracks to watch to race. Maybe because it’s in Primetime, at night or perhaps it’s just a great surface and banking to make it exciting. I am hopeful tonight’s race will be the most exciting event thus far. We are nine races in and everyone has played nice. Speaking of nice, let’s talk about who to watch for tonight.
Grill or squish in the panini press until the bread is crispy and more importantly, the cheese is melted. Devour while it's hot. If you don't get covered in marinara sauce eating it, you're doing something wrong.
Surrendered to the flirt.
Deirdra: Do you ever experience a snag in a story, a form of writer's block? If so, how do you deal with it?
on an expensive yellow leather couch.
22, 1970, sec. 2, p. 2. Reprinted in Congressional Record, vol. 116, pp. 9197-9198; Daily Record, pp. E2420-E2421 (March 24, 1970) and in Collegian, St. John’s College, Annapolis, Maryland, April 13, 1970. (Incorporated in Item B-1, above, pp. 315-19 (1971).) See Item D-IV/7/1989, below.
I emphasize the importance of bathing for several reasons with the main ones being practicing good hygiene and skin care. With her having a boyfriend I spell out why she needs to make sure she bathes regularly. I do not want her on the end of an ugly rumor about body order or bad skin. I’ve been there and they rumors were unfounded and totally untrue. But in case, there is evidence that she doesn’t want to bathe or shower regularly thinking she has “more important things to do,” which she has yet to understand the health risk she’s taking. No, a bird bath does not and cannot take the place of bathing and showering under no circumstances.
“You sure? I have a car seat. I have two.”
If the collapse of civil order accompanying the onset of our Muslim Troubles is on the scale that we predict, deploying the British Army will be the only way the government can try to restore a semblance of order in the worst-afflicted areas. Though the police will of course be playing a supplementary role, by themselves they will be utterly overwhelmed by the scale of what confronts them, just as the RUC was overwhelmed by the rioting in Belfast and Derry in the summer of 1969.
Coconut milk:1.5 cups
There was no way to check if it worked so I made the $2.99 "investment" and bought it.
Let us look at South Africa's performance from this point of view. In the 1960s production and social service activities were labour intensive and employed a level of technology much lower than that of today's sophisticated industrial and information technologies. Communication systems were much less developed and a much larger share of economic activity was non-tradable. These circumstances suited the South African economy perfectly. It had access to a large pool of cheap and submissive labour and was richly endowed with minerals and raw materials required for the infrastructural development of both its own economy and for those of its trading partners. Foreign competitors offering consumer goods were distant and did not threaten local producers which were perhaps less efficient and productive but which nevertheless had acquired the technology for setting up an effective and internally competitive South African economy.
I’m still struggling with my patient communication thing. I have a really hard time talking to the patients. I’m pretty good at reading lab values, looking over the chart, understanding the disease process, and knowing what needs to be done, but when it comes to actually having to have a conversation with them, I still have a really hard time.
It might sound audacious to say that one bookstore devised a strategy to counter the long reach of Amazon. But it’s no more audacious than Amazon’s conviction in 1999 that you could sell books over the Internet.
This act of defendant constitutes a misappropriation and/or impairment of the natural resource property he holds in trust for the benefit of plaintiff minors and succeeding generations.
"Aunt Anne was raising that very question."
Notice how we’ve changed. As aware as you of the changes. It’s a pity that we can’t do nothin’ ‘bout it now ‘cause we did nothin’ ‘bout it to begin with. A big dark cloud now hangs over us, still hangs there as we speak. Holy smokes, what are we goin’ to do? The most smartest men! Where have they been? Woo, I say it’d take the most smartest men to figure out how to stop it. The invasion, what it has done to our neighborhoods and all. How can we take ‘em back? Don’t say there’s no way now. So the day has come that I hoped would never come…the day they moved next door, so we have to live with their hot links, and barbecue, and Playin’ the Dozens. Not that Lucky knows ‘bout Playin’ the Dozens, he don’t. Now we have to call ‘em Colored. Fine! So they’re Colored. Is it Colored or is it Blacks? And they’ve moved next door and there’s nothin’ I can do about it but move and what happened on the football field and the baseball diamond is now happenin’ all ‘round us, and why is it happenin’ where we live? We want to know. Ah, it would take a genius to figure it out, I guess, when I guess we’re not geniuses, or else this wouldn’t have happened to us. But to say something now out in public would let the world see how we are really. We are really! Lucky when we hear somebody spout off ‘bout somethin’ they tell us we should know, what do you say? Welcome to the real world buddy! But we’ll have to see, won’t we?
I want to give a special thanks to both Colleen and our editor, Tanya, for making this book happen. It has really come together beautifully!
God loves you, and it is so important that we are right with God, because we never know, when he will take our lives….Be ready, and prepared. Pray this prayer….
Forgetfulness
Give me solitude, give me Nature, give me again O Nature your primal
I decided to make earl grey macarons, along with another batch of the lemon macarons that I made earlier this month. For the earl grey macarons, I sprinkled a bit of minced earl grey tea on the tops of the shells, and made an earl grey brown-butter cream cheese filling to go inside.
This is not a recovery.
7:00AM - Turkey goes into the oven.
Barb the (slowly but surely disappearing) French Bean
This time, though, the needles seemed much bigger.
Guide to Buying a Fine Wristwatch
And that, good reader, is how a theologian is made. If your theology is empty and soulless (or Emergent and Seeker Sensitive) or your Pastor’s preaching more fluff than substance (or cute stories than the development of exegetical themes), the reason lies in unfamiliarity from and disinterest in the Bible.
Maybe Simpson will be more relaxed and chattier on her shows the rest of Monday.
That was Zachary, the almost-me. Perhaps he exists in some alternate reality somewhere. I hope you enjoyed getting to know him. I certainly did.
The same goes for calls for stiff prison sentences for rioters.
August 31, 2006 Clip No. 1324
I really am not sure what to do. I am supposed to work Wed, Fri & Sat this week, however we are still under Winter storm warnings, hard freeze warnings and the news keeps talking about the roads being bad. If they are going to be this way tomorrow, WHY would I drive back to that store? Um I don't think so. The job is not worth possibly getting into a major wreck, getting hurt or killed. No thanks.
It’s easy to see why the legend of the Blue Men arose. There are many treacherous waters in the Minch, but the channel where the Blue Men are said to lurk can be wild and vicious even when the rest of the sea is calm. They take the appearance of blue figures with streaming white hair who rise from the water, clutching at boats and dragging them down.
So, the bottom line, and I say this to the myself of five years ago, or anybody else who doesn't know any better, or anybody with a child in SPED entering a public school: At our district, it is actually the General Ed kids who steal resources and teacher time away from the Special Ed kids. In today's tough times, when budgets are so tight, it's really not fair that a federally funded program should be drained away by kids who don't qualify for it. Oh, yeah, that's right, I went there.
New Belgium Brewing Inc. Le Terroir
There's more :-)
"You don't really understand human nature unless you know why a child on a merry-go-round will wave at his parents every time around - and why his parents will always wave back."
On the inside of my album I just made some pretty cutout frames to embellish and I used my cuttlebug to emboss the inside of each frame. The small journaling area's I did not emboss so it would be easier to write on.
i have 6ish months until the big day & i'll be living up the rest of my youth by:
1And there appeared a great wonder in heaven; a woman clothed with the sun, and the moon under her feet, and upon her head a crown of twelve stars:
TO MY DAUGHTER…
Monday, April 9
* Your cover is in competition with the most popular books of our decade.
I drove there with my hands on the wheel at “9’o clock” and “3 o’clock”, just like they teach you in Driver’s Ed. My hands were shaking that badly.
The #1 rue when it comes to the Mahjong Wrestling Federation, 95% of its roster are lesbians with superpowers. We kick this episode off with some Ryuuka and Toki bonding as we see how Ryuuka invited Toki to join the Noble Core.
Check out the gourmet brownie flavors packed into this impressive gift: The perfect brownies for that special recipient.
So i've kept you all long enough. Just before I go, thank you to all you lovely friends who have sent me birthday cards and gifts, I will try and get round to emailing you all individually over the week. Your thoughtfulness never seizes to amaze me, you truly are the best!!!
Guinsoo: Maybe that has something to do with it.
The Prison Chicks are doing great! We have eggs out to you know what! We started with 9 hens and 1 rooster. We now have 16 hens and 2 roosters! That's Queen Vicki keeping her distance and posing! She lays an egg big enough to be a double yolk!
Age:- 32
A brief description of an INFJ, "INFJ's are introspective, caring, gentle, and complex people that strive for peace and derive satisfaction from helping others. INFJ's are highly intuitive, empathetic and dedicated listeners. These traits tend to act as a, "tell me what's wrong," sign on their forehead, hence the nicknames Confidant, Counselor, and Empath. INFJ's are intensely private and deeply committed to their beliefs."
Once you’ve done it you know you can do it again. If you write 1200 words a day then that’s about 2 months to write 65,000 words. Ok. A little more. If you’re taking a break like the one I took then that about 62 days to write 65,000 words.
In Disney's Lilo & Stitch, Lilo and Nani's last name is Pelekai.
We have a brand new sponsor this week too! Motivet Rubber Stamps is with us and Stephanie, the owner, has generously donated stamps to our team and a fabulous prize for our winner!
Lolo xx
Now, I’ve written 235 words and they all make sense. Taking a moment to look back on what I’ve written so far, I have to admit I’m pretty happy with the result up to this point.
Most of us are comfortable with the idea that there is some kind of duality to our consciousness. The difference between left brain/right brain approaches to processing the data coming in from our senses is well documented. And with this project, we've often talked about the "me" that is attached to the physical body, and the other parts of our awareness that are more connected outside of space and time. Dr. Jill Bolte Taylor's book My Stroke of Insight is amazing to me because it blends these two ideas so beautifully - is the right brain more connected to those larger patterns that are outside of our physical reality? Dr. Taylor provides a compelling personal narrative that tells us this is so.
ZBIGNIEW SIFERT violin
It’s no wonder that in 2011, a successful ballot initiative calling for the removal of red light cameras in Houston won its strongest support in minority neighborhoods. Nor is it surprising that the NAACP of Cincinnati, recognizing a proposal for red light cameras as an attempt to balance the city’s “$28 million deficit on our backs,” led a petition drive and forced a referendum that banned them in 2009.
11 also
Whether you are pursuing the life of an artist, are making life changes or wish to start a creative venture, you must have focus, discipline and courage. If you have not yet read Amma's New Year's message, she addresses this to some extent by reminding us that our most valuable asset we have is time, which we too often squander. Keeping focused on the purpose of our life is paramount, especially as we move through the day and encounter seemingly small things that become large obstacles and that take us off path.
They couldn’t be further from the truth, because the anti-Islamic ideology is opposed to everything that Anders Behring Breivik did on that horrible day. Anders Behring Breivik’s warped mind is much more in tune with those of radical Muslims and violent jihadists who don’t see anything wrong with killing innocent civilians in their struggle to achieve the global fascist regime that the Koran mandates. One of the most prominent tenets in the Counterjihad doctrine is that it under no circumstance condones terror as a means to achieve an end. As a matter of fact the Counterjihad community came about as a direct result of the violent and fascist behaviour of various Islamic radicals and Islamic regimes.
For my card I did a stepper card using all elements from the new Sugar Plum Daisy CD, if you like pretty and fairies you'll love this one, I printed off the house topper and the bottom and front panel. I did reverse one of the side panels in gimp so that they faced out. The fairy image was coloured with Promarkers and glamour dust added to her wings. The butterfly I attached with a thin strip of acetate so that it wobbles......bit like my hips after eating far too much chocolate this week ......lol.For the grass I used a Marrianne Designs die which also comes with a sweet bird on, and the flowers are sequins available from Mei Flowers.
Use the Loctite as directed on their instructions. Let the first coating dry completely.
My Creative Time Stamp Set donated by Emma
Eggs that have been injected with
Maps & Atlases On Tour:
First up, Cotswold 3.8 Lager. As the name suggests a 3.8% lager. The Label makes mentions of the 1516 German Purity Law & Saaz, Syrian, Goldings & Cascade Hops & Optic malted barley. All fascinating stuff I’m sure. I guess if you wish to flog more pricey lout you have to make mention of such stuff to give it an air of quality.
As you can probably tell, I haven't been blogging much this year. This is for two reasons. I'm quite busy with revising the novel I hope to query late this year/early next year. Secondly, I've lost my passion for blogging. I lost it awhile ago, if I'm to be honest, but I kept hoping it would come back.
Over a year ago a conversation was started on a situation that many arts teachers are familiar with involving choices that high school students often have to make around course selections and decisions on their future. The wisdom provided by a veteran teacher stuck with me. Marvin Bartel responded from his wisdom of many years of teaching experiences. He had what I call the helicopter view. Sometimes when I am stumped I go up into my helicopter and take the big or long view to help me solve the problem before me.
And she's ready to start a new chapter in life.
It’s seldom that I admit this, but I like Star Trek. I’m not talking about the professor X Star Trek or Quantum Leap guy Star Trek or Deep Space whatever but the original Kirk, Spock, and Bones, Opera singing in the opening theme song, Star Trek.
The bioavailability of Guarapad Blood Pressure is high because it is absorbed directly into the acupressure points of the sole of the feet.
My sweetcorn, sunflowers and courgettes have all sprung up...I had to repot them all last week, cos my mini-green house fell over in the wind and all the soil and seedlings fell out...most of them have survived though!
Her throat has healed, yes, but she still cannot speak. Kesta worries that perhaps she never will again, but neither he nor Mesdan wishes to tell Eliss that. She rests on Kesta’s bedroll, surrounded by gifts of stone or spice, condolences on her family and blessings for her survival.
Second step: reassemble your shattered brain
Emotionally Max makes plain right from the start what the Grinch eventually comes to want. Both want to be loved and accepted and part of the happiness, and Max keeps that want right on the surface while the Grinch is slowly figuring it out. The dog wants to please and he wants to have fun, while the Grinch can’t get past how annoying the Whos are with all their noise.
I've decided, I don't think I will ever perform bellydance. Why? I don't like people to look at me. Why learn bellydance only to not ever let anyone see you dance. It doesn't make much sense, does it? And I really don't care. I just want to know how.
A final Professional tip: The width of the band of focus for any specific f/stop is wider on the wider-angle lenses and narrower on telephoto or zoom lenses. Be especially careful using long lenses (e.g. 200mm or higher) with a wide open f/stop — you may be unpleasantly surprised at how narrow the depth of field may be. If your SLR camera has a “depth of field” preview button, you can use this to visually assess the effect of any specific f/stop. It does this by forcing the lens to stop down so you can see the effect through the viewfinder. Look in your camera’s manual to determine if your camera has this feature and, if so, how to use it.
We’re talking protein and fibre-rich chickpeas blitzed with olive oil, tahini, lemon juice, and fresh garlic. It’s bright, chirpy, and nutritious.
This is my dream
Lumpyhead decided he wanted to be a dragon for Halloween, a gold dragon, so I stayed up all night last Friday sewing a costume. I produced one that was waaaayy too small. A few alterations made it wearable - a little lame, but wearable - and once Bump figures out the portable minifan/flashlight/fire-breathing part of the costume, Lumpyhead will be ready for Trick or Treating.
I found a blog this evening and immediately thought of all of my Florida garden blog friends. The blog is called TROPICAL TEXANA: Texas Gulf Coast. I dare you to click the link and not think you’re in Florida! So for that reason I'm adding it to my Florida Blog Roll. A quick run-through of this interesting blog revealed that David is the blogger and he doesn’t grow roses. So sad. I had high hopes of finding another humid zone 9 rosarian, but I guess we’re as rare as hen’s teeth. Oh, that reminds me! He has chickens!! I even saw one in David’s house inspecting the Norfolk Island Pine Christmas tree. I hope you’ll check out David’s blog. It’s full of bromeliads and other tropicals that I can’t grow but you southerners can.
ABV: 8.8%
This is what I made for today's SCS Clean and Simple Challenge 125: Red/Black/White. I love this color combo - it is so crisp and classy. I used Rainbows & Clouds stamps and dies from Li'l Inker Designs. I ADORE this stamp set and the dies that come with it. There are oodles of possibilities for color and design! I doodled around the edge of the card for a little different finish.
So if you see yourself reflected, in any way, in the description, please come along! I think it will be a great space for discussion and organising
All is peaceful in the kingdom, until a rich and powerful westerner called the Collector plans to steal the Golden Dragon. He sends his agent to the Himalayas (on the same scary small plane as the Colds) to snatch the golden statue, and also the old king who can make the magic work. Nadia and Alex are soon caught up in the plot, and find their bravery and friendship tested to the limits as they help the prince rescue his father. Only when the Golden Dragon is returned will the kingdom be safe once more.
150B West 10th Street
Ms Simmons is of course entirely right to argue that the remedy does not lie in imposing further costly and restrictive controls on the legitimate brewing industry, and indeed is staring us in the face:
- A wise guy, Smurf Village, 28/3/2012 08:32
Two fruits that I love combining in a cobbler or crisp is rhubarb and blueberries. The recommended combination with rhubarb is strawberries or raspberries, which is good but my favorite combination is with blueberries. The contrast of the sweet and tart seems to have perfect flavor balance.
I didn't start watching the show for any reason other than I LOVE being a mom and think most moms follow an unwritten rule book by supporting one another through the good times and the bad. Knowing this woman named Kate had twins and then 6 more, I knew she would have good times and really, really bad ones so I enlisted as a "fan" of the show as a means to give her my support... in a "GO GET 'EM GIRL!" kind of way!
we’re assembling
By Frosty Wooldridge
I was only able to find one (one!) recipe for a dandelion quick bread on the interwebs, made by a handful of bloggers all using the same recipe. I adapted it, and now there are two! I used a mixture of wholemeal flour and AP flour to start, and my friends seemed to think it was a perfect move, as it added a bit of heartiness and an earthy quality to the loaf. I also replaced the honey with golden syrup -- but if you live in America, it is probably difficult to find this ingredient, so honey would be a perfect re-substitution. Also I think buttermilk is amazing for almost everything, so I added some just because I could. Aaaand I added the glaze. You should, too.
But we need our dryer, y'all. And I am NOT going to a laundromat again, not me, no way.
You can’t be believed or respected if you say “It Gets Better” from one side of your mouth, while the other side says that you wish an entire political group was “just fucking dead”.*
In psychology this week, we’ve been talking a lot about how we learn: intuition, personal experience, reason, and the scientific method. In psychology, science is, of course, the most important (who would take medication that ‘felt right’ or try some pill a friend whipped up in their kitchen and recommended saying ‘it cured my cancer’), but in writing, it’s the opposite.
CL. We tried to put together a programme of great presenters drawn from different theoretical positions – theorists, curators, practitioners, who are in a good position to answer some of the questions that we want to address. Some of them have been involved in the archive as users, some helped to collect the archive and some are represented in it but each of them will have some kind of position in relation to it and the issues and debates that it encapsulates.
All the young people of Egypt who can take to the streets should do so, in order to strengthen the good and pure youth, in order to confront the oppression. Anybody who is capable and has no good reason not to should join these young people.
1/2 cup pine nuts, toasted
We got to the center part and had some hex sticks to use.
She will be born soon (although it doesn't really feel that soon to me) and maybe things will be good and maybe not, and I just feel like I am waiting on this edge of a cliff and I don't know how the world will tilt or which way we might fall.
Watching the film is an experience in itself. It starts off with this quote from Job 38: 4 and 7:
We went home for a very quick visit so my Mom, Sister and I took the boys out to Wildwood to see if we could get any good pictures. Mom had her camera too and Aunt Whitney helped us chase the kids around, keep them out of the pond and helped make them smile for the cameras! Here's what we got...I think they turned out pretty good for amateurs!
Hi Crafty People,
Converting my closets recently from Winter to Summer clothes, I came across some summertime pajamas I purchased last Spring. They weren’t flashy, but the sweet kind of PJ’s you buy with comfort in mind. Pretty, yet functional. Finding them brought a smile to my face.
Statement from the Faithful Budget Campaign in response to
4, Rape, especially with underage victim
manage to feed her a tiny bit
With Tylenol you take two, while with Advil you take one and wait for a while to see if it works and it usually doesn’t so you take another one. That’s why they have the “1-2″ imprinted on the pill. Or does that mean you’re supposed to take only one-half? Oh, God, I think I just OD’d on Advil.
She slowly made her way across the anatomical landscape of the baby, pointing out the four chambers of the heart, the stomach, the kidneys, an arm bone and the umbilical cord. She spent a little too much time on the baby's brain, which sent my decreasing anxiety right back up the scale. Sensing this, she suggested that maybe she wasn't talking enough, telling me what she was doing. I told her a play-by-play would be really helpful, and it turned out to be, particularly as I squinted at the screen trying to decipher what I was seeing. Frankly, I don't know how they get anything from those images. I kept uttering "uh-huh" everytime she asked if we could see certain things, only because I felt it would be a poor reflection on my nascent motherhood if I admitted that actually, I couldn't see my baby's parts at all.
Here’s what you need:
Currently I am always excited when I see new posts popping up on these blogs (in no particular order)
I realize now, after a few free days that could have been dedicated exclusively to yard work, time is not the only problem! I’m no longer able to spend six to eight hours on my hands and knees tending flower beds. I cannot spend three hours with a shovel and a wheelbarrow, double digging each of my raised vegetable beds. How did I ever do it? I can’t do it anymore.
All this sewing makes me tired...so, sit with me for a quick cuppa~ This is the Verandah porch that exits my office on the second story of our home.
Most cities and suburbs around Vancouver have these outdoor fitness parks. They have several machines that work just as well as those in a membership gym enabling you to work out your arms, legs, abs, etc. These parks are getting more and more prevalent around Vancouver and I’m sure there are some right near you that you don’t even know about!
Clean and oil your grill thoroughly. Preheat grill to medium high heat. Using a brush, lightly oil one side of the pizza dough. Place the dough directly on the hot grill and cook for about 2 minutes. Brush oil on the top surface of dough, flip and cook for 2 minutes more. Remove from grill and garnish with your choice of fresh toppings…such as
Chiltern Railways and CrossCountry services were affected. Passengers were permitted to use the following train companies’ services where appropriate: Cross Country, First Great Western, London Midland and Virgin Trains.
But before I worry about those, I want to get some seedlings started. Usually I just go to the garden store in April and buy flats of annuals to tuck in around my surviving perennials, but this year I’d like to save a couple of bucks on plants to use towards the new planters. So I’m going to start from seeds. And I found this amazing idea for how to begin the process. I’m so taken with this idea that I’ve got all my office mates bringing in 2 litre bottles and seeds next week. We’re going to green our office!
The following March he was back, having apologised and won the season opener in Phoenix. Once more the fight for supremacy was between Senna’s McLaren Honda and Prost, who had swapped seats with Berger and moved to McLaren’s closest rivals Ferrari. For the third successive year, Japan was the deciding point for the championship saga. This time it was Prost who needed to win to keep his title dream alive. Senna took his customary pole position but bitterly complained all weekend that pole position was on the dirtier side of the grid. He campaigned for it to be changed and Prost actually agreed. The officials granted Senna’s request, but Balestre refused to back down. Consequently Senna vowed that if Prost turned into turn one first, he would regret it.
The Fringe this year does not start until the first week in August, but the deadline for entry into the Fringe Programme was nine days ago and yesterday afternoon at 5.00pm was the final deadline for making changes to any of the entries. The Programme is published in June.
Who would have thought it? I was certainly shocked. I suppose it's a little similar to way we can feel about children. They're all very lovely, but until you bake your own (sorry, I couldn't help myself) you don't fully appreciate them. And then you think that yours are simply divine, clearly better than anyone else's. Don't get me wrong, I love kids, but it's not until you have your own that you really understand that beautiful parent-child (baker-cupcake) connection. Well, I imagine this is the case, anyway. It certainly resonates with me and my newfound feelings towards cupcakes. But maybe we'll just leave it at that...
The lens was sent recorded delivery to Sigma in the UK and in only 5 days over a weekend too it arrived back re-chipped and cleaned too. Stuck on the D7000 and it worked like a dream. So there you go, in this day and age when the consumer now expects to be shafted silly there are sill a few companies out there giving decent service. My faith in the Sigma brand is restored and I wouldn’t hesitate to buy Sigma again, I always felt they were better built than the more expensive Nikon lenses anyway.
Care his error
The thing with Oktay Rifat is that I can't understand much of him. This book of his, I usually open it and read something. But it's not often he grabs me. Oktay was another very important contributor to significant changes in Turkish poetry. He won a poetry prize, he had many books published, poetry books and novels as well, he wrote free verse... still he can rarely reach me.
Alex Aldridge has a most interesting piece in The Guardian about Acculaw – a new initiative to cut the costs to law firms of training. I’m still doing my thinking on this venture – but it is a good read from Alex.
Here are just a few photos from the days we did nothing.
Sunday: moderating a panel: Critique Groups: How to Give and Take a Critique
· Record the content and turn it into Audio Books
There are very few such parties where, what we might consider to be America's somewhat draconian laws on under aged drinking are not widely broken. Many parties will arrange entertainment, which can include adult movies, and the hiring of male or female strippers, depending on the gender or sexual proclivities of those throwing the parties.
My favorite use for stinging nettles includes cleaning the body of toxins and work to purify the blood. With all the toxins in our food, air, water and commercial products, our bodies certainly need regular detoxification!
The central issue was the cost of removing asbestos from the old building.
In this case you have to make a decision. If you are a risk taker with a “what the hell” kind of mindset and feel the girl may be shy (which doesn’t necessarily mean uninterested), then I say go for it. But if you aren’t sure or deep down feels that look away from you as you looked at her is a signal that she doesn’t wanna be bothered, then please do not try to force and interaction.
6. Sally Pearson World Champs Win – I know I’ve talked this race to death, but 12.28 in the 100 hurdles is as awesome a performance as there is. It was poetry in motion. And it’s always nice when we see athletes do it right and approach suspect performances.
Blandford Fly - (Premium ale)
Where exactly was the procedure performed and who payed for it?
Nature, and Nina, just in black and white
Things seem to be looking up, or at least getting back to normal. On Saturday, Party Guy called about half an hour after I'd made plans to meet Southerner at 9pm for dancing, so I told him I was free before then. He suggested 7pm for drinks. Of course, it was St. Patrick's Day, and the place he'd picked had a line when I arrived. Mr. LOC was on line, standing very close to a woman, then rubbing her shoulders. I said hi from a distance but I didn't approach because I wasn't sure I'd recognize Party Guy immediately and didn't want to be awkward.
This is my third day in a row of blogging. The fact that I keep coming back each day and blogging is a testament to how much I love Super Keely and Captain Dumbass. That you keep coming back to read my blogging is a testament to your ability to punish yourself.
Me: "Yes please. I'll take a double of Crown and ginger."
On Saturday I got dragged into irresponsible and uncontrolled pub based environments where socially irresponsible landlords want to sell you as much beer as possible due to a lack of social conscience driven by the profit imperative. Pubs are irresponsible places. There are rules in pubs. Rules about drinking in rounds, standing your round and matching your mates pint for pint, drink for drink. You can’t opt out with a soft drink, to do so makes you a puff. You have to get smashed; it’s like the law or something. Pub landlords are happy to serve you, regardless of how smashed you get, and if you find yourself in an incapable state then it’s all the fault of Tesco as the incorrect assumption is made that you were drinking before you went out. No one in their right mind would drink before meeting up with my pals. Actually no one in their right mind would drink with them full stop, but that's the way men make friends. You meet some people at school and university and these people become your friends and stay your friends regardless of whether you still have anything in common now you're all grown up. We don't really make friends as adults as we don't really want any, as the initial requirement based on childish insecurity no longer exists.
Megan will be dancing her sweet little heart out at the concert again. I asked her to dance a hornpipe this year. She cheerfully tipped her head to the side, accessed her internal notes and took off across the floor. That girl can dance. Makes my old Irish dancing injury ache just looking at her.
In accordance with the provisions contained in Rule 10 of the CCS (RP) Rules, 2008, there will be a uniform date of annual increment, viz. 1st July of every year. Employees completing 6 months and above in the revised pay structure as on 1st of July will be eligible to be granted the increment. The first increment after fixation of pay on 1.1.2006 in the revised pay structure will be granted on 1.7.2006 for those employees for whom the date of next increment was between 1st July, 2006 to 1st January, 2007.
This week, Gavin DeGraw (who struggled mightily with his Salsa) and Urkel (who received high praise for his latin moves) danced in a lopsided ‘battle’ for the judges save. This was not Gavins night… nor was it his dance.
UPDATE ON THE FIRST LADY FOR YOUR INFORMATION 10/1/11
6. Raise the royalties on resource extraction (lumber, oil and gas and mining) while reducing regulations.
“and a voice from heaven said, “this is my son, whom I love; I am well pleased with him.”” (Matthew 3:17 CJB)
it took him two days to wrestle a hog to the ground. In the last
I thought this was a Bedelia sketch at first. If only. The biggest mistake that can be made when trying to make an annoying character funny is to make her annoying characteristics too annoying. And Nasim’s whining was way too grating to be funny. But she was funny when she was actually talking over the whining. C
I was comfortably settled in the hotel chair trying to concentrate on a book when I heard the soft knock I'd been waiting for. I couldn't wipe the grin off my face as I answered the door and let you in.
Human Rights Watch said the death toll continues to rise. It said at least 233 people have been killed in five days of violence.
“If you’re REALLY the Son of God, then why don’t you save yourself? You saved others…why don’t you get off that cross and save yourself?”
That is, about $12.50 in US money – unheard-of amounts of money for many, in a country where the average wage across the countryside amounts to about one US dollar per week.
This focus on “far-right” followed an order to the police to “go easy” on Muslim terrorists.
Now we’re tired and lonely and out of a home.
More and more, I get asked how I cook them, so I’ve decided that even though this isn’t the most complex recipe, I’d post how I cook my artichokes. And I’ve added my tips for sauces. What’s important is to trim the artichokes so you don’t have any sharp tips left on top – they can be nasty. This also reduces their size so you can fit them in a pot more easily. Once they’re cooked, I serve them whole, but I have also served them cut in half as starters to great success. I slice them carefully down the middle, cutting through the heart, place them inside up on a platter and drizzle them with vinaigrette dressing. Make sure to put an empty bowl on the table for the leftover leaves. For a starter, you can estimate a half per person.
Santa and his bag of loot, that is. Capitalism at its most glorious. And what a nice Christmas it was. As soon as I'm done typing here, I'm gonna go sit in my new leather rocking recliner. Ahhhhhh! On top of the loot collection feature of this holiday, we also made a batch of my mother's Christmas cookies. I hadn't made them in a decade or more and the activity of making them, the smell of them, and the taste of them evoked wonderful childhood Christmas feelings. Besides, it's about the only time I get to use the mace from the spice rack. Here's the recipe:
This card is one I've CASE'd and uses the cute DeNami robots. This little robot is one of my favorite new stamps. I made this card using the robot for my great-nephew's birthday that is coming up this week.
Cheers! Texas LIVE
For doing this I had find out how to reward myself. Is doing or not doing is enough, ot should I make categories within in one element? After the first trail week, I noticed, that every elements has a range which I can "easily" fulfill, so I excluded these cases from rewarding.
http://okienurse.blogspot.com/ I love Vickie's work! She always does a brilliant job of making her creations & she's a great teacher too! Go look at some of her posts to get doing something different! She will inspire you to try "That something different"
Me: In the spirit of Twitter, tell us about The Hunt in 140 characters or less.
"The footage provides us with our first tantalizing glimpses of Cross River gorillas behaving normally in their environment," said Christopher Jameson, director of the Takamanda Mone Landscape Project. "A person can study these animals for years and never even catch a glimpse of the gorillas, much less see anything like this."
On another invitations note... I saw the Wilton ones in AC Moore believe it or not. I like them overall. The handmade pressed paper jackets are beautiful but the card itself is a low quality cardstock (flimsy and plain) and the "ivory" ribbons are yellow. I would probably replace those with a deep purple and it would still be cheaper than any other invitation cost wise.
I have had several pomegranates floating around the studio for awhile, as I love to paint them. Their round shape with the prickly crown makes them an interesting form to paint.
Starting with boredom....am I really eating because I am bored??? Well then what's a girl to do? First we need to identify the time of day we fighting the boredom most. Is it a daily occurrence? Or maybe just weekly? Once you have established your pattern, you can work to change it. Did you know you have to do something 21 times to make it a habit? Remember that while you are making new ones.
“Please stop swearing,” said Emily.
One of my favorite readers has radar. Every time I have not posted for a while, she picks up the phone to see what is wrong. She's got a good record! This time, a wretched cold -- just when I thought I had gotten through winter feeling fine. I probably picked it up on the plane, but who knows? Tomorrow, if it is not better, I'll see about getting it checked. Chicken soup hasn't done a whole lot to help.
Some of the FCS schools that had the majority (if not all) of their football games televised in 2011: Lafayette, Lehigh, Liberty, Maine, Montana, Montana State, Murray State, Northern Arizona, and seemingly all of the Dakota schools (including, not so coincidentally, national champion North Dakota State).
Oct 2nd - Buena Park, CA taught by Jennie Black - Open to stores & designers
Well, they aren't holo and they aren't duochrome (ok, maybe a tiny bit) but they are glittery and quite stunning in my opinion. I think the let down of not being holo is what turned me off but I'm glad I caved in. I do love all things glitter you know.
“It’s not about the cash flash, it’s all about the implicit value of your relationship. People send thank-you notes to the maitre d’ — not even thank-you notes but cash-value surrender trade.”
While I don’t know if the New Age aspects are necessarily intentional this show does have three main themes that are very near and dear to New Agers.
Carrots — California
Yes we want to see girls and pearls on your creations!!! So easy peasy with all the wonderful girly images out there and pearls...well who doesnt have the biggest stash of pearls somewhere ...lol
He was right. And looking back I do believe that was the last day we ever searched for toads or salamanders. Was our innocence stolen that day? I guess you could make that argument as our discovery led to a newfound appreciation of the opposite sex.
Support for assigning images to contacts
“Oh, yes, yes we do,” I replied. “I’m no longer hungry.”
That new peace gave us another gift. The opportunity for me to view the challenges and issues with a clearer mind and lighter heart - all the better to see things m'dear.
And we really don’t know anything. Not even her birth date. The day we celebrate her birth, June 26th, is only a guess. A heartbreaking speculation for the day our child was born into this world.
Policeman in court for fraud
The big loser of the day seemed to be Nebraska’s Alfonzo Dennard who struggled transitioning from his back pedal to running with receivers downfield. This is a concern because some had already questioned Dennard’s ability to turn his hips smoothly and run with receivers as he was burned by Marvin McNutt, who doesn’t possess too much straight line speed himself. Dennard looks more comfortable up at the line in press coverage and will surely have to be protected by over the top coverage, where he has a safety to pass his man along to. Dennard also looks much more comfortable when the play is in front of him, as he shows nice ability to click and close on his target. Dennard is a player that doesn’t fit all schemes but he is still an extremely efficient player who excels in other categories… it just so happened that today’s drill work exposed many of the main weaknesses Denard possesses as a prospect. I am expecting a better showing in the coming days and think he will do much better in the game on Saturday where the coach’s will play to his strengths and allow him to play in a scheme his is most comfortable in. None of the other corners were too impressive, especially Boston College’s Donnie Fletcher who got high in his back pedal and showed a lot of tightness in his hips as well. I am excited to see how this group responds to what I considered a lackluster day from all involved.
make lips smile, hearts leap,
The part where Jesus speaks of the Abomination of Desolation as spoke of by the prophet Daniel, I used to believe and have spoken of frequently as being spoke of in chapter 11. During this quest for the truth about the two sabbaths. I found out that I was wrong about that and for that I am sorry. I do personally feel that the verses in chapter 11 and chapter 12 are connected somehow. The abomination of desolation spoke of by Daniel that Jesus referred to is in the 12th chapter, a prophecy about the end times. The exact verse and I will quote it for you all and you can all go look it up in the bible is chapter 12 verse 11.
Another mystifying thing in the movie is the intuitive program, the Oracle. Her gamble with the Creator is most intriguing. No doubt she’s an intuitive program but who taught her the feeling of love? It is understood that programs cannot love or hate or do something illogical but in the movie we see Rama Kandra, who is also a program, taking her daughter to the Oracle to save her because he loves her. Love, a way of saying, as he explains to Neo, is a profound connection with someone. When did programs started having profound connection with each other?
Her heart the captive of which he speaks
Hamburg (Germany) / NDR Radiohaus - January 13, 2012
I laid there & when my brain came back online, I remembered the day before & I hit the alarm clock funny. With the buttons touching each other, I must have turned the alarm clock off.
Not Downtown, but nearby, are two excellent pubs in which to raise a pint to toast the Emerald Isle. The Irish Pub, located on Pleasantburg – and owned and operated by an Irish guy named Patrick (really!) – throws the grandaddy of all Irish parties! With live Irish music, complete with pipers and step dancers, and authentic Irish food and drink, this party celebrates all things Irish (hey, even the bartenders are Irish)! Not to be outdone, Fitzpatrick’s Irish Pub on Laurens Road throws an killer céilidh as well. Offering food and drink specials and live music, this pub is definitely worth checking out!
Too many people put off something that brings them joy just because they haven’t thought about it, don’t have it on their schedule, didn’t know it was coming or are too rigid to depart from their routine.
I also managed to finish a small art quilt which i am entering for the 3 creative studios color palette challenge. I love the purple silk dupioni layered with painted orange batting and foil. I added angelina fibres machine and hand stitching and a few beads.
revolution,.. they’ll
Tickets purchased!
Simplicity and minimalism features in both form and function in this kitchen and the result in a functional yet restrained design.
After further abuse and inappropriate attentions from the slimy Ranjeet, Seeta finally escapes from the house and Kaushalya reports her as missing to the police. However Geeta happens to be at the local police station where she is ‘recognised’ as the missing Seeta and picked up by her ‘aunt’ and ‘uncle’.
(NOTE: These figures have always been disputed. At no time have there been any credible official figures given for the number of people who died that day.)
No reputable news outlet Tweets at collegiate athletes. In the eyes of those reputable newspapers, if I were to Tweet at an athlete, it would signal a poor attempt at a fanboy who somehow got credentialed to get his work out to people.
May’s gift to everyone, a locket of Heart Passion. Here is how to use it:
What was the IPKat doing back in October 2007 when he missed the registration by Pfizer Inc of a Community trade mark for the word VIAGRA in Classes 01, 03, 09, 10, 16, 25, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 35, 41, 42 and 44. The large range of goods and services covered by this registration includes the following, which the IPKat offers without comment:
24. Always has my back even when I am wrong—when I’m wrong tell me behind closed doors
Smoke Free
Now there's somethin' you don't see everyday. Wel hell, might as well check it out.
All monies raised — 100% — will be donated to the Pittsfield, Stockbridge and Bridgewater Disaster Relief Funds and the Rutland County Long Term Recovery Committee, all of which are working with their local communities to distribute monies to families in need.
Reason #3 -- Racism is a bigger undercurrent than anyone wants to publicly acknowledge. Lots of people know urban blacks who rub them the wrong way. They are seen as obnoxious and defiant, a group who intimidates and seems to expect something for nothing. Let’s just get it out there: that is a subculture that does indeed exist. But they don’t speak for African-Americans any more than poor rural racist whites speak for Caucasians. But if all people allow themselves to see is the stereotypical angry urban black man then they’re not going to want to give any quarter to what is seen as an ungrateful race. Or understand how someone like Obama could change the mindset of African-Americans permanently.
But for the Malays will political power in the hands of Pakatan necessarily equate to Ketuanan Melayu?
“Never mind that. We’ll get you a new one when we get to shore.”
I guess this would make it official: all of my machinations to guide her towards man-ish activities have failed. Madison is a girl. Since I don’t have sisters, this was the first time I had actually seen anything like this in person. I suppose it was the next and inevitable step up from walking through all of the pink aisles at the toy store.
Historical Records Survey, Tombstone Transcription Project
they are both marathoners
My job is not my life.
Spock is all grumpy and emotional because he’s experiencing “pon farr,” which is Vulcan for “guys who really need to have sex,” but he doesn’t want to tell anyone this because it’s super secret or embarrassing or something. If Vulcan males don’t mate during pon farr, they die. Apparently they have to sex up a particular Vulcan woman they’re betrothed to because that lovesick groupie Nurse Chapel is hanging around, bringing him homemade Vulcan soup, and Spock doesn’t want any of what she’s offering. (They have to mate on Vulcan, too, apparently, because that works better for the plot.)
Mr. Fun's team worked on the assignment for weeks and developed an idea they were very excited about. When they showed it to Mr. Quiet, he hated it. He thought it was stupid, juvenile, and would cost the agency dearly. Mr. Fun loved it and thought it would be a huge success.
And on a lighter note...I said fanny...hahahahahaha...yeah...I'm like a 5 year old. A coworker said it the other day, and I'm trying to work that awesome word into my daily vocabulary.
One afternoon, two weeks ago, we needed a break after days of rain. We cannot leave Old Dog for long, so we headed westwards for a few hours, across the Avon Valley into Dorset and the soft, green countryside of Cranborne Chase. In the photo above, the River Avon at Ibsley was in full spate and water rushed angrily over the weir.
I felt like those braxton hicks had pestered me on a daily basis. They were a constant reminder that I was close to my due date and that it could happen any day and I literally sat on the edge of my birthing ball for the last 5 weeks of my pregnancy wondering when it would be. (I had swapped out my computer chair for my birthing ball to help open my pelvis and hopefully get my cervix ripening)
Please support this if you can, it’d be much appreciated and it also award charities that are much deserving. Thank you.
Therefore, by the simple standard of serving the citizens of this nation, and compromising to pass legislation to take care of the debt and deficit, these men and women on this committee have failed us.
I'd love to hear any of your additional flea market tips or fun flea market related stories.
Ted asked if I had any problems to heal and I said no. There are what I would call ‘niggles’ in my life, but nothing serious, and it is all in progress for repair at the moment. So we started a general treatment. Somehow Ted knew exactly which issues to clear up, bearing in mind we had only spoken briefly that morning and had not met before this event. He talked me through an energy meditation and I felt the power pulsing through my body. Physically I shivered a couple of times, and I felt my charkas responding. Then Ted moved to focus on my head and things really took off.
As expected, things didn't go quite as expected. This time we had to shut off the water for the guy who was putting down linoleum in the bathroom. This with 20 minutes left for the mash to finish!
On the other hand, the fears that were partly linked to the Prostitution Act have not proved true, in particular in the area of fighting crime. The Prostitution Act has not made it more difficult to prosecute trafficking in human beings, forced prostitution and other prostitution-related violence."
Moral of the story: Never make a woman angry...There will be Hell to pay
If you feel visiting is your duty or a task, and not a pleasure, then please stay away. We'll both be happier if you do.
. . . Van Hollen, speaking inside the Department of Justice room where the permits are printed, said no problems have been reported since the law went into effect six months ago, refuting arguments made by “doomsday people” concerned about legalizing the carrying of concealed weapons.
_Roland Fryer, 34, Cambridge, Mass. Harvard University economics professor who studies causes and consequences of economic disparity due to race and inequality.
Bryce Dessner: I was in London last December to play with the national and bunch friends were in town, both Sufjan Stephens and Nico Muhly were in town. Nico is actually very close friends with Jaime who is the organsist at the West Minster Abbey which is where, you know, Queen Elizabeth and the Royal Wedding happened and everyone from Chaucer to Hyden and you know, Darwin is buried in the church the organ is beautiful. We went to see a concert there and there was actually an advent concert that was really, really amazing. I thought it would be really cool to try something different this year and have Jaime come and actually play an organ concert this year as part of the festival and do a lot of- he’s into new compositions for organs. It’s an intrument that people don’t really get to hear a lot of outside of a kind of church setting so the idea of having concert music played on the organ- you know, doing, being outside of Memorial Hall and having some of the young composers write for him, which is really exciting. Jaime is well known in the organ world, but not, you know, in the normal our kind of MusicNOW fans. But I think it’s great for people to experience something really new.
I very much enjoyed the novel.
I should be so thankful; now the pain has gone away
Until a smear is picked up on by the press, who will not generall run stories based purely on internet smears, for all intents and purposes it doesn't exist. Only when it hits the press should responses be published.
We will march in May during the NATO meeting to deliver our message: Jobs, Housing, Healthcare, Education, Our Pensions, the Environment: Not War!
If we stay alert to the fact that individual nouns, and particularly abstract nouns, routinely turn out to refer to distinguishable things we can sometimes clear the smoke away a bit from philosophical arguments. For example ethical theorists (perhaps not the best ethical theorists, but quite a few ethical theorists) might see themselves as involved in some sort of partisan contest: are the “rights theorists” correct (or better or what have you), or are the “consequentialists” the ones who are giving us the best account of things? Or maybe virtue theory is preferable to both? Certainly philosophers working on ethical theory are frequently identified as “rights theorists” or as “consequentialists”: “I’m a consequentialist” is taken to mean not only that one endorses consequentialism but also that one declines to endorse the other types of ethical theory on offer.
Morning Train (9 to 5) - The Angels (Dolly Parton N’80)
To serve, place a dollop of the cheesy yum in each soup bowl, sprinkle some of the mozzarella on top, and ladle the hot soup over the cheese. Sprinkle a bit more mozzarella over the top and serve.
"Black and white, three channels, rabbit ears," I say. "But I didn't have a camera yet. The first silhouette picture I could find in the archives dates to 1968."
Add water, salt and pepper according to the consistency you want, and leave for a further 10 minutes. After this, add some parmesan if you have some, and season to taste.
removed from the Sigur Rós of old, yet it is clear that no other band could have done
Easy now, sit you down.
Hey, George Soros--kiss our Red, White and Blue ass you son of a bitch! You may be able to sway and control much of the media via your commie-bastards at MediaMatters, but you can't control the rest of us.
Who cares that I have scheduled vacation? I must get this posted. I am too sick or too tired to write today. Suck it up sweetie. Write! Write! Write!
Also if you read my last post, you may remember that I hit pay dirt at Michaels with 90% off Easter Clearance.
Sour Kraut was the proper name and it had to be done just right. Mama made sure of that even if it took the whole day and all night.
Mix all ingredients in a bowl on medium speed. You can add more or less powdered sugar depending on how sweet you want the frosting to taste.
to attach the socket upside down or to attach the cap on
You obviously believe subway seats randomly place $20 bills in pockets!
Anyway, onto this weeks' challenge set by the wonderful Tams. Boy this was a tough one for me!!! Out of everyone's challenge this was the one I was dreading LOL!!!! (Sorry Tams, this one made me struggle!)
Here is the one I have created
I'm not talking about my bowels! You'll be forgiven for thinking I was because quite honestly it's a stupid name this trend has claimed and I worry it could not be taken seriously as a result. You only have to say "I've gone No Poo," and you will get weird looks and people think your new diet is dangerous.
and THIS is Roxie
Aki: WOW?!!!!!! How you know mommy?!
I am almost drooling down my shirt just thinking about this cake. I made it a couple of weeks ago when we had my brother and his wife over for our monthly family dinner. When I was looking at my favorite food blog for my usual dessert inspiration and came across this cake I was a tad skeptical. I love cake, I love strawberries and I love strawberry cake. However, I wouldn't say I'm a hugely wild fan of limes. BUT...let me just say that there is something about the combination of the strawberries and the lime that totally WORKS! It's a match made in heaven.
Driving distance: 27.6 miles; Trip duration: 31 minutes Driving time: 31 minutes
The mother, however, filed a lawsuit Tuesday against St. Theresa’s College, seeking damages for not allowing her daughter to graduate just because of the photos posted on the social networking site.
I think the container is designed to be a single serving because once the plastic seal is removed I was not convinced that replacing the paper lid would keep the cheese fresh for very long. I ended up draping a piece of saran wrap over the top and then replacing the lid.
Operation EBay has begun and so far it has taken up a great deal of time and energy. However this is just the learning curve and research stage so each item listed is taking time and the whole procedure is being refined so that we have a working model to follow that will make all the other ( hundreds of ) listings a much smoother process. Files will be made and records will be kept so we know exactly how much we make ( fees for selling on EBay and fees for using Pay pal to take into account! ) and there will be a sheet of instructions so that Alan is able to do it if need be - if I am having a bad day, week or month as sometimes happens ;-))
In the right dose, everything is a poison. Even love . . .
It's not a great picture, nor is it a very attractive thing. What is it? Something you rarely see, yet it separates fine bourbon whiskey from mere alcohol.
The two bigger Snoppies are rice balls (onigiri) which I shaped by hands with a plastic wrap. For these two Snoopies, I had to cut out the facial details manually, since I only have mini nori punchers which are mainly used for decorating quail eggs.
Best Pump Clip or label
but it wasn’t fair for me to be told that i was the one to throw them out. because i think i did my best.
Hopefully the freedom expressed by the very formlessness within form that is jazz will be realized by the people of Tunisia.
The movement began with a small group of teachers, including Jesse Turner, who walked from Connecticut to the District of Columbia last August to protest the No Child Left Behind Act and Race to the Top. Their efforts predated actions by state legislatures across the country this spring to curb teachers’ collective bargaining powers and tenure, noted Bess Altwerger, a member of the movement’s organizing committee, who hosted a reception for Mr. Turner last summer. She said the shortcomings of the American public education system do not lie with teachers.
The alliance between Western elites and Islam is so strong that as well as changing our culture by Islamification, the judiciary are now breaking down the Jewish community. They promote Sharia Law while making Judaism illegal under the totalitarian Race Relations Act of 1976.
The current situation is this. BHAFC want to build a training / academy facility in the area. By their own admission, the current piece of land is too small for their needs. The local residents don’t want the development so close to their properties because of the potential noise, light and traffic nuisance. The current planned buildings will dominate the area and be totally out of scale to other buildings in the area. Plus, of course, it means that the community will lose an important area of public open space..
The Kitchen God will want some plums.
"You’re on dog steroids Shag!"
It's no big secret that Simon has been looking for an artist who could crack the very lucrative pre-teen market for some time, particularly in the US. If you like, he wanted his own rival to Bieber and, taking a leaf out of how professional football academies develop youngersters to feed their main team, Simon wanted his own singing academy and Ronan was just one of a number of identified youngsters, with whom SYCO intensively works with.
What if your children came to you only when they wanted something, would you feel that they loved you? If your children spent their life studying how they could get you to give them what they wanted would you feel loved? How would that make you feel? Personally, I will feel used and unloved. How about you? Knowing God just to experience more of His blessings is not loving Him.
It’s pretty obvious that a long time ago, the real Rod Stewart decided to simply give the people what they wanted. He won’t be the last musician to head down that road, but for him to wind up permanently living there is disappointing. I’d feel the same way about any talented artist who was content to mass produce the same item over and over again for Wal-Mart. Early in his career, he brilliantly took some hand-me-downs from Sam Cooke and The Stones and made them into a custom suit of Rhythm and Booze that only he could fit into. The rented tuxedo that he wears today, anyone could use. Why do I think there is a real Rod Stewart, an artist, somewhere underneath his still perfectly quaffed head of hair? Let’s go back to 1970 when he wrote a song called “Gasoline Alley” that was about his future. With his good looks, voice and stage presence, Rod knew that stardom wasn’t far away, but he also knew there would be a price to pay for that fame.
the page on the Calendar and
of Nigeria’s Soya-beans and
How a man named Nobody became the battered face of G20 protests Globe and Mail - Adam Nobody was face down, his arms held behind his back, and a police officer’s fist smashing into his face, a now infamous video shows. He had left his house to see what the G20 protests were about. Now he was under arrest. … John Bridge, who shot the video of Mr. Nobody’s arrest swore an affidavit that Mr. Nobody did not attack any of the police officers, and was not armed. One of the key questions is who arrested Mr. Nobody. The officer listed on the arrest record provided a badge number that doesn’t correspond to anyone on the Toronto force, according to the SIU, or to any officer believed to have worked in G20 policing. At his court appearance last month, the Crown conceded that there was no evidence to support the assault charge. The Crown lawyer said the officers’ notes did not indicate an assault had taken place. The Crown also said Mr. Nobody’s “assaultive behaviour” did not amount to reasonable and probable grounds for arrest. “The Chief of the largest police service in the country has made an allegation of fabricating evidence against Mr. Nobody and Mr. Bridge in circumstances where, apparently, according to the arrest document, the police have falsified a badge number,” Mr. Falconer said. “The police refuse to come forward to acknowledge who beat Mr. Nobody. This is the stuff of totalitarian regimes.”
As some of you readers may recall, I have been making some visits to my bestest's abode, to assist in a little Master Bedroom updating! We are off to an amazing start and will be finishing up and revealing quite soon, but my last visit wasn't all focused on the Master Bedroom. In fact, because she is like my own personal sister, I knew she wouldn't mind me raiding her entire homestead, snapping pics of some snazzy organizing she has going on in casa de Josh & Erin! You see, when you are an organizing fanatic like myself, you start mentally organizing and placing things in ANY space you walk in to. That's right, whether I am in a grocery store, picking strawberries in a field or chillin' up north at a friend's cabin, I am taking in my surroundings, looking for inspiration and mentally organizing anything that seems a little out of place! It's NONstop I tell you!
Colon cancer is one of the most easily preventable diseases; however, many fail to have the necessary test. If you are over fifty or have a family history, get moving to your doctor for some probe fun.
Introduction 1
There’s a tendency to use my blog as an internal talking shop, to mull over ideas on a screen which automatically kicks in the editor in me and erases the really stupid ideas I have but nonetheless dedicated resource to. But occasionally, just occasionally I act on my musings and go out and do. This was the case yesterday lunchtime when after a mediocre salad lunch in the staff refectory (though it’s trimming my waistline again), I wandered off towards the Orange shop. I was armed with questions as the interweb was again not able to answer my more…bespoke queries relating to termination of a contract arranged through a third party supplier et al.
This amuses me.
1/3 c crumbled blue cheese
I chose a frame and sentiment "Enjoy Life's Simple Moments" which seemed perfect for my page. I needed the sign to hang on the right hand side of my page but the hanger was meant to be on the left hand side when stamped. To solve my issue, I stamped it onto acetate, handcut it and flipped it around and applied it to the right hand side of my page. The sign is stamped with Memento Rich Cocoa and diecut with Spellbinders Labels 15.
A couple of years ago, while our research team was working on a project in Grant County in deep rural east-central Oregon (read our report or journal article), we had the opportunity to sit in on an “economic summit” for the county. The local extension agent pointed out that the two industries that formed the historic economic base of the county—timber and cattle—were both in long-term, permanent decline.
One high school day, I sneaked out of the Mendiola gates of my school and walked with my friends to Greenhills.
woke from the chrysalis of
It seems the children who grew up with “tough teeth” thanks to Mrs Marsh and her liquid and chalk demonstrations in the ’70s and ’80s are neglecting their own children’s teeth. Children are brushing less regularly, not visiting the dentist as often and consuming more sugary drinks than water.
Jill: WHAT?! Why didn’t you tell me earlier?!
Do not try to avoid them or disassociate yourself from them. Embrace whatever comes up and thank it for helping you move ahead. Thank your Higher Power for giving you the opportunity to release these issues. Remember, you don’t want these issues to stay stuck in your body.
He didn’t falter. “No, you didn’t remember.”
i also got to use a fair amount of glittah on my snow which made me very happy, i can never get enough glittah!! All my edges got the going over with craft paint that i added impasto paste to so that once dry it would lose its dimension and then added all my glittah in layers over the impasto.
Today I am sharing some of the mini-books I learned to make from one of Dawn's video's, I have 2 craft fairs coming up the end of November so I am making lots of goodies to sell, I thought these mini books would make a great gift this time of year. I created some with a Christmas theme and some that would work for any holiday or event you might want to scrapbook. I love the way they turned out and they are so easy and fun to make.
So, with that in mind, over the next month I am going to reveal some of my house to you guys. We are renting our home so I haven't done anything monumental, but it's pretty amazing what some paint and 3M command strips can do :)
Who’d have thought that cake etiquette could be such a minefield?
Wonder Boy, on the other hand, was not so lucky. After going through last year's winter clothes, I found one -- ONE! -- pair of long pants that he could still wear. (Not that I mind that he's growing like a weed, considering we have lived the alternative. But still...)
Actually, John le Carré is part of my news but not a part I am at liberty to reveal for reasons concerning which my fingers are still crossed and so refuse to type an account. There is much my fingers are refusing to type at the moment: like all extremities, they are most superstitious being, as they are, situated so far from Central Control and thus vulnerable to every rumour and snippet of gossip doing the rounds. Having being burnt several times, they now wisely keep their councils to themselves and refuse all instruction even from the most impeccable of sources.
But in this month I learned new things except just studying which was interesting and totally new experience for me.
To enter the contest, reply to the tweet with your answer to the writing assignment. So, to enter my sample contest above, you would reply tweet me your spaceship haiku. Each contest will be open for 24 hours at the end of which I'll pick the winner(s). At my discretion (and based on prize availability), I may pick more than one winner. I'll then contact you to get an address and mail you your book. Because I'm eating shipping, at this point, this contest is only open to folks in the United States. That may change in the future, but for now, I'm having to stick to it.
The sad thing is if that nail had not been sticking out and someone had picked up that hairband he may never have needed to come in to us.
Love so full it floods my senses
Though he’d had considerable coaching by mentors, in May 1990, “Obama” hadn’t had much public practice.
She thanked me for being kind to our divine Ms. M when she was “being so mean” she is sharp as a tack, I could have spent so many more hours with her if the realities of deadlines would be so kind to disappear. They never are.
Written by: Paul Epworth / Kid Harpoon / Florence Welch
Received this beautiful shabby chic style card from Karen on Tuesday and I just love it. Sadly the technology is not there for you to touch that butterfly, but the texture on that surface makes is very real. Karen wrote to me, that it would be a little late but I would happily have awaited longer for a wonderful creation like this.
Exercise is a necessary part of living a healthy life
You are now ten months old. You have now existed outside of my body for as long as you were inside. In the "inside" ten months, you went from a tiny cluster of cells to a newborn baby who breathed and sucked and looked at the world in wonder. In the "outside" ten months, you went from a helpless, tiny little thing to an unstoppable force of nature who talks and moves and discovers and delights. And makes messes.
You open your eyes, in a cold sweat,
Last week our own Governor Cuomo “announced a groundbreaking agreement on a new statewide evaluation system that will make New York State a national leader in holding teachers accountable for student achievement.” Standing side by side by side with union leaders they hailed the “state’s commitment to put in place a real and effective teacher evaluation system.”
“I don’t much care where,” responds Alice.
According to the U.S. Business Journal, roughly 80 percent of all workers’ compensation claims filed are legitimate. However, it is still important as an employer to watch for these red flags that may indicate a fraudulent claim:
12.Beast in my Bed
Hopefully by Friday I can put together the post I’m planning for the letter lessons we’ve done this week. I’ve been very encouraged by their success thus far!
To whom is the arm of the Lord revealed? The answer is given in the words of the Lord Jesus Christ in Matthew 11:25-27, “At that time Jesus answered and said, I thank Thee, O Father, Lord of heaven and earth, because Thou last hid these things from the wise and prudent, and hast revealed them unto babes. Even so, Father; for so it seemed good in Thy sight. All things are delivered unto Me of My Father: and no man knoweth the Son, but the Father; neither knoweth any man the Father, save the Son, and he to whomsoever the Son will reveal Him.”
Please share this story far and wide so that your friends and colleagues can learn the truth about the IoM and where its money really comes from.
Author Stephenie Meyer’s four-book series, Twilight (September 6, 2006), Eclipse (August 7, 2007), New Moon (May 31, 2008), and Breaking Dawn (August 7, 2008) have sold 17 million copies, principally to pre-teen and teen girls, and spawned more than 350 fan sites online. According to the author’s website, these are the statistics for Twilight, her first book in the series. All are published by Little, Brown Books for Young Readers.
It recommended that the municipality's director of corporate services be suspended and investigated over alleged illegal staff appointments and the unauthorised buying of vehicles.
Robert Griffin III is going to be exceptionally fun to watch, and he’s already better-liked than Donovan McNabb was. Funny what a little humility gets you. The rest of the draft was a little puzzling, especially the selection of another QB, Kirk Cousins.
Put your name up on the board.”?
In “Marvel’s The Avengers” the world’s greatest Super Heroes assemble when Iron Man (Robert Downey, Jr.), Captain America (Chris Evans), Hulk (Mark Ruffalo), Thor (Chris Hemsworth), Black Widow (Scarlett Johansson) and Hawkeye (Jeremy Renner) join S.H.I.E.L.D.’s Nick Fury (Samuel L. Jackson) to protect the world from the dangerous and powerful villain, Loki (Tom Hiddleston).
I've got a long way to go. This plot is too big for just me, I've decided. Not sure what I can do about it. Maybe plant half of it in pumpkin and summer squash.
V, a flight attendant, gushed about her love of NYC. It was her favorite city. She felt like herself there. Despite her world travels, there was no place she’d rather be. I wondered where my NYC would be. I knew it would be some place with a mild climate, near beaches, but that’s as far as I could figure.
I was just looking at the new photo of you on the other lady's BLOG...and you surely DON'T LOOK 37...Maybe 28.
Rats are also profoundly prolific. If food and shelter are adequate, rats will breed throughout the year, although fewer litters are produced in winter.
The Vatican report took the nuns to task for making “occasional public statements” that disagree with the bishops, “who are the church’s authentic teachers of faith and morals.”
tablespoon onto ungreased baking sheets and bake 8-10 minutes, center will be soft and edges light brown. Cool 5 minutes on baking sheet, remove to wire racks until completely cool. Store in airtight container up to 1 week.
﻿A simple and sweet card!
He organizes a demonstration for the release of Sacco & Vanzetti, but when they are executed on August 23, 1927, Di Giovanni turns to violent actions with the Scarfo brothers (Alejandro & Paulino); many bombs are set off, especially aimed at North American interests. For example, on December 25, 1927, the National City Bank was bombed, & on May 3, 1928, the Italian consulate.
Previous Examples in recent times?
Every episode of Scooby-Doo follows a highly formalised schematic. A ghost (or demon or other paranormal bugaboo) is reported in a lonely location. The investigators repair to the scene. They meet the ghost but fail to be deterred from the investigation by it. As they dig deeper into events, the workings of the atheistic clockwork slowly become apparent. There is no ghost (or demon, etc). It is merely an illusion, a man in a mask! The impostor is carted off to prison and the five heroes move on to the next case in a psychedelic van. Somewhere behind all this, in the furthest reaches of metaphor, an enormous Richard Dawkins must be rubbing his hands in glee, looming over the dénouement like the absolute antithesis of the demon in Night of the Demon.
Then the other night, slithering on hands and knees from the bed to the bathroom, it struck me. There's a much simpler and more satisfying explanation. The attribute that makes people exceptional at advertising is that they're better at noticing things. They're good noticers.
I think and mull things over to the point of obsession. I need to understand the Who, What, Where, When, Why and How’s of my world. Introspection allows me to look at my role in conjunction with others. I use to be that kid who had an excuse for everything. “It’s Not My Fault!” I would cry out from my room, quick to blame the sisters or brother who started it. However Time and Introspection have taught me that the roll I play in a conflict or situation is just as important to the reaction I get from others.
3) Goals: Goals should come into the equation when looking for shoes. Are you a casual runner? Looking for a marathon PB? Speed and distance make a difference to a proper shoe fitter.
What am I going to feed this kid?
“You did it, man!”
Then someone moved into the apartment across from me over the summer. Somehow, she was given the pot. Planted something in it. Let it die and abandoned her apartment last month. We lay claim to this pot. This is where it's story will end.
-Gourmet chocolate-caramel apples (came in a freezer-package in the mail, very cool)
I have to say, though, I was particularly impressed that a few of them would even supply fish coated in gluten-free batter, if requested. This was particularly useful as Meg was diagnosed with coeliac disease a few weeks back, and it’s not always easy to convince her why she can’t have certain food items any more.
When the previous class was done, his adorable little sister came skipping out, grabbed his box of Nerds, poured half of them into her mouth, and accidentally spilled the rest of them on the floor.
1. Some have to humble of a view of self
The whole thing came down on April 25th, and since then, the trail is cold as ice. Fox News account:Police believe that Zinkhan shot his wife, 47-year-old Marie Bruce, along with 40-year-old Tom Tanner and Ben Teague, 63, at a community theater near the University of Georgia's Atlanta campus.
Check out some of these insane outfits:
I also saw how few exhibitors had anything that might really grab your attention. I'm not talking gimmicks but something different, something that shows a little thought, something that makes you stop and stare or think or act. Something that no-one else has.
Frank Boeijen Groep Zwart-Wit NL
AND, Toby said I could ride with him at his barn for a few days next year. I could have went the next day after the show if I wasn't flying out. He said I could join their Troop ride where I could ride with a sword and a spear and we'll go for a ride through Great Windsor Park. Yeah, I'll be back next year!
We got to the hospital at 6:30 AM...I am NOT a morning person. Romy on the other hand was in a delightful mood even though she was STARVING...we had to bring her current meds, and she looked like she was self medicating for her impending doom...don't worry...the lid was ON... ;)
As I flew past people, hair flying, heels knocking, panicked look on my face - they stared. Come on, people! Haven't you ever seen a woman lose all face to save her child?! I mean, you don't care that you're scaring little children. You don't care that people are pointing and gawking. You don't care that you lost a shoe about 20 feet back and you're now hobbling up and down at about 8 miles per hour through a church atrium.
I wanted to share it with you not just because I think the Guardian are doing something everyone should know about – making literature more accessible, more wide-spread. But also because this short story is so gripping, so well written with bucket-loads of pathos and not an ounce of sentimentality.
on a bus
generally want challenges. It adds a point of difference, and
They know that Santa's on his way
One very noticeable thing right away is the fun name and label for the brew. Santa's Butt has a double meaning, the first is obvious, the second is that "butt" is also for the 126-gallon beer barrel Santa is sitting on.
I'll feature my favourite posts next week.
United coach Mario Gonzalez hoped round two would be easier.
they remind me of that, or more
While the U.S. welcomes a wealthier, more globally engaged China, it no longer regards China as a developing country that warrants special treatment concerning global rules. Washington also looks to Beijing to take on some of the responsibilities for international public goods that major powers should assume, and it worries when Beijing declines to do so.
David Barton is trying to nail jelly to his wall builders wall by spreading the notion that America is a Christian nation. Christians do not make a habit of committing sin. America does. Sin is America’s worst habit.
If NOT NOW…. WHEN?
But if you really want to taste the simple gourmet flavor of true vanilla sugar cookies, make a batch by all means.
Please upload your cards to your blog, a gallery, or photobucket and remember to give us the EXACT links to see them. You can do 5 of the same cards or 5 different ones (as long as they follow the current challenge) If you do 5 of the same, please show us a picture of them altogether. If the linky isn't working for you for any reason, just post your link in the comments! Thanks!
That's really the perfect combination of things, if you think about it. Unifying, simple, sweet, charming and crazy. Actually, if you have children, you should tell them those are the things they should look for in a spouse!!
that should come to mind is,
-The Segments: -What Are You Doing?: Really!?! has a new baby sibling. B
Ingredients: Water, Cetearyl Alcohol, Behentrimonium Methosulfate, Cetyl Alcohol, PPG-2 Myristyl Ether Propionate, Hydroxyethylcellulose, Stearalkonium Chloride, Glyceryl Stearate, Glyceryl Distearate, Dimethicone, Caprylyl Glycol, Stearyl Alcohol, Glycerin, Hexylene Glycol, Citric Acid, Tetrasodium EDTA, Phenoxyethanol, Yellow 5 (CI 19140), Yellow 6 (CI 15985), Linalool, Limonene, Hexyl Cinnamal, Fragrance .
Baal, was worshipped as the key to fertility and prosperity. To entice Baal to bless their land, mothers were required to present her firstborn child to the priest.
The opposition’s effectiveness is weakened by its own amorphousness – it is a loose alliance of leftists, Western-oriented liberals, nationalists and other factions. Some demonstrators were clearly impatient with the lack of a clear and focused program.
The two N.C. based beatmakers once again prove more than capable holding down the mic and I continue to be impressed with their jaunts over to the other side of the Hip-Hop performance spectrum.
The spring has finally began creeping in! I went for a walk in the park today with my mum, the dog and Toto (my bearded dragon, who spend the entire time eyeing up the birds suspiciously) and it just smelled like spring.^__^ And the flowers have begun popping up, it makes me happy.:D
Irene Taylor wrote a great introduction and obviously loves the work of Emily Jane Bronte and thinks that Wuthering Heights is also a masterpiece. Curiously she also calls Villette Charlotte Bronte’s masterpiece. While I enjoy Villette, I think myself and most people consider Jane Eyre her masterpiece. Does anyone have any thoughts on this?
No, but I say that the things which the Gentiles sacrifice, they sacrifice to demons and not to God; and I do not want you to become sharers in demons.
Me: Yes – it is a big cold ball of gas – not solid like the Earth.
~ I drink Red Stag the way Cookie Monster eats cookies.
Empty the dustpan, poison the moth.
The sale of herbal products is not regulated in the United States. They are sold as dietary supplements without proof of safety or a standard of quality control.
Well the Gypsy ladies of my imagination have had a lot of fun making garlands to decorate their dresses.
He acknowledged that the last Labour government had made too many interventions in running the NHS and had not done enough to create more affordable homes.
To tell you what, I’m still tired because of that long walk. I just drew some stuff on my sketch pad just to make my whole being relaxed.
(the vents thevents)
(most fabulous dealer of majolica, tramp art, faux bois, textiles, tole ware,vintage Christmas, and all sorts of incredible antiques ever to be found at the Marburger Farm Antique Show every single spring and fall! ) even if you are a bit direct in telling me how you feel!
All of this needs unpacking. Rimington's statement implies that books admired by the literary establishment are not in fact much read. Possibly in response to Robson's call for proof of this, judge Susan Hill tweeted last week a list of classic books which she finds 'unreadable', beginning with James Joyce's formally and linguistically innovative Ulysses and including War and Peace and Woolf's The Waves. Now it has to be said that only last week a serious literary thinker and innovator of the stature of Will Self commented that nowadays hardly anyone reads Ulysses. The judges are onto a certain contemporary truth which it would be foolish to deny, and which Self characterises thus: '...the novel, instead of moving on, lies there in the dark summoning up past pleasures while playing with itself in a masturbatory orgy of populism'.
To the members of our parliamentary caucus: I have been privileged to work with each and every one of you. Our caucus meetings were always the highlight of my week. It has been my role to ask a great deal from you. And now I am going to do so again. Canadians will be closely watching you in the months to come. Colleagues, I know you will make the tens of thousands of members of our party proud of you by demonstrating the same seamless teamwork and solidarity that has earned us the confidence of millions of Canadians in the recent election.
15. Kyra - This Wondrous Day (Flemish)
I've gone on the elliptical machine at the gym at work three times. I'm using it because there's a limited motion and there's no impact, but I can still get a good cardio workout.
Running Total - 428
-Not how, but how else? Exploring Innovation and Practical Solutions in Professional Services
Friday: 6:30am-midnight
1 ½ cup trimmed, split and sliced leeks
The biggest “what the hell is going on with the creature” moment you’re having right now is probably about the two Emancipation Angels in the deck. Well they work as a semi aggressor early and the combine themselves with other sweet cards in the deck that you will see soon. But also, they work fine with cards like Snapcaster Mage, Inquisitor Exarch and Æther Adept if you want to use them again without flicker cards.
For more information, please contact Liis Jeffries at 250-378-8820
Finally, of course, I love that Castle’s a writer. Every episode contains a line or two about constructing a plot, about making a story believable, about throwing in a twist. There’s a lot of “if I were writing this…” and quite a few instances of truth being stranger than (or just as complicated as) fiction. While I don’t write crime fiction (or read much of it, except Agatha Christie), I appreciate the nods to Castle’s chosen profession, which is also mine.
So women and men who absorb these movies are sent messages on what things we “should” look for in a man, but never really addresses the complexities of what we REALLY WANT – a guy in the middle. Also, men are sent messages that women want the kind of guys we see in these kinds of movies and they start doing such things in real life to get women, only to walk away with less than favorable results.
Those other scrapbooks that made me feel pressure, they've faded but not the women that created them. I remember their friendly faces. Their encouraging words. Their adamant invitation that I join them at their monthly crops. I remember their kindness.
Mill workers will march against the NTC on March 1 st from Currey Road station bridge, west to Gold Mohur Mills, Dadasaeb Phalke Road Dadar East starting at 7.30 am on the following demand:
All in that golden glow that affirms for me that there is something much much larger than my little problems.
Matthew 24:12,14 And because iniquity shall abound, the love of many shall wax cold. And this gospel of the Kingdom shall be preached in all the world for a witness unto all nations; and then shall the end come.
In addition to being one of our two beloved librarians, Trevor is a poet himself and author of Rarer and More Wonderful, a finalist in the poetry category for the 2009 Northern California Independent Booksellers Association Book of the Year.
(The discount will appear in red lettering on the payment screen).
She was way too pleased with herself.
Don't worry! We will still have plenty of furniture re-dos (a new piece reveal this week), crafts, recipes and random thoughts! !
And leaves the purpose with the unseen Cause.
It’s a new year and things are slowly getting back to normal after a crazy holiday season. In fact, it was so crazy I didn’t get to hand-make a single xmas gift like I wanted to. FOR SHAME.
It's back to all the regulation rattling and rambling next week
We have been organising our workshop list for the beginning of next year, but it has proved very problematic, and we haven`t managed to send it yet. We had hoped to do it up to April, but every date we want in April is not available at our usual venue, so we have been trying to find somewhere else. Debby is hopefully going to finalise it today and get the list sent out - fingers crossed. We have been busy working on samples and trying to sort out what we are going to do. I will be doing another Beginner`s Course, and this time have decided to do a set of cushions. I have started to put them together , but I have quite a lot of quilting to do yet, as you can see from above. I need to stitch the circles, and can`t make up my mind to do it by hand or machine. I have used some of the new Moda Etchings Wovens from 3 sisters, plus a charm pack of Panier de Fleurs by French General, with a couple of others thrown in for good measure. The one below I will do by machine. They would go in my sitting room beautifully, and I am rather fed up with the cushions I have at present, so the may end up there! There are two others, but I have a little way to go with them yet.
Friday, June 1 & Saturday, June 2: JazzU with special guest Tim Warfield
Also, feel free to link back any other outfits created for this challenge!
Felt beyond a doubt
such fun
‘Oh, you want to come?’ I say yes. ‘Ok… but do you have a dress?’
The effects of a stroke depend on which part of the brain is injured, and how severely it is injured. Strokes can cause sudden weakness, loss of sensations, or difficulty with speaking, seeing, or walking, since different parts of the brain control different areas of the body and its functions. It is usually the area immediately surrounding the part of the brain that suffered the stroke that is affected. Strokes are not always accompanied by a headache, and therefore may be completely painless. It is imperative to recognize the warning signs of stroke and to get immediate medical attention if they occur, by calling your local emergency number or an ambulance.
Nine all out rantings (Wal-Mart you are the bitch teat at which I must suckle this holiday season, mostly because of your cheap stocking stuffers).
In limited U.S. release for about a month now, Lisa Cholodenko’s The Kids Are All Right is already being touted as a potential awards-season frontrunner. And in a year as bleak for U.S. films as 2010 has thus far proven to be, I wouldn’t really be surprised if this prediction turns out true, especially given some exceedingly solid turns from Annette Bening (who I didn’t know I missed until now - I don’t think I’ve seen her in anything new since American Beauty), Julianne Moore, Mark Ruffalo, and Mia Wasikowska.
We were out shopping today at our mall and I found keys in the Disney characters.
John Cleese’s first line in the film as Sheriff Langston is “What’s all this then?”, a direct reference to the first line that any Law Enforcement types always uttered on the classic series “Monty Python’s Flying Circus“.
Q: Fernando, what a way to celebrate the 60th anniversary of Ferrari’s first win. Ideal way wasn’t it?
We have been working on a few specific projects together including some Beer Dinners and The Great Beer Debate and a couple of other little projects which should allow us to make an absolute shedload of cash and retire by the end of the week. Or not. I'll let you know.
We're at the end of a three-decade long incarceration "bubble" that dwarfs that witnessed by any other society in history. Perhaps, just as folks are rethinking their reliance on free-market ideology for analyzing the economy, the criminal justice system should be rethinking its reliance on this primitive, flawed metaphor based on the same principles. After all, it's taxpayers paying the price, which it turns out is not the same thing as enduring the punishment.
Or...
I look forward to, hopefully, seeing a pub full of people drinking and enjoying some smashing beers from the likes of Fyne Ales, Black Isle Brewery and Tempest Brewing over the next few months.
Interestingly, the way the family falls apart like this after Hélène's affair ends suggests that what was holding this family together all along was the wife and mother's ability to find pleasure outside the home; without Victor, she just lounges around the house, her face blank, not even bothering to get dressed. Everyone else has a reason to go out — Michel to school and Charles to work — but she had only her affair, because otherwise she's just a housewife in a sumptuous bourgeois house where all the work is done by maids and servants, her very comfort and her security leading to her boredom and disaffection.
Angela will probably be back on Mau`i again next month to check out the other vendors. That's the beauty of planning a "semi-local" wedding where you can come visit and have meetings as often as you want.
Online Masters Degree in business administration and management focuses on leadership training. This program is great for upcoming business leaders in the world. You can do the program while at work, at home or even on vacation with minimal change to your daily activities or family responsibility. You don't need to pay transport fare to attend lectures in the college class room. You don't need to rent an apartment or travel to another country to do your masters degree program. You can do the course conveniently from the comfort of your home.
colored lamps which bled blu noir
“Americans are invaders, and jihad against Americans is an obligation,” said Abdul Sattar Khawasi, a member of Parliament from the Ghorband district in Parwan Province, where at least four demonstrators were killed in confrontations with the police on Wednesday.
I am a little late, I know,but I wanted to wish you all a wonderful first Advent.
"What we need now is some new, fresh clichés."
I am really extra giddy over here. Tonight is the start of my Christmas vacation (or holiday vacation, depending on how you want to look at it). I am planning on serving up myself a hot whiskey to kick off the season. I have presents to wrap and I am determined to start my wrapping before Christmas eve. That's insane. Fortunately, the children are still in school tomorrow, so maybe I can squeeze in a few more in daylight.
Place the back over the tucked fabric. Press firmly with the pusher to snap it into place.
*not all in one go.
And really, half the train wouldn’t even hear it. Which means they wouldn’t hear my screams to run as the rabid homeless baby army came to gnaw at their limbs.
The boys go back on Thursday. Big Son goes into Key Stage 4 and is immediately plunged into all thing GCSE. Poor sod. And Small Son officially leaves the Early Years Foundation Stage and ploughs into Key Stage 1. He's officially a big boy now and even has his first wobbly tooth to prove it. Daughter goes back on Friday. She's just freaking out because she hasn't received her bus pass yet. I should probably be freaking out about that too but until I started to tell you about it I'd completely forgotten. (Must ring the transport people. Must write that in THE DIARY. Must remember to look at THE DIARY.)
83. Shawn Lee's Incredible Tabla Band - Apache (4:56)
Districts 20, 21 - 415 89th Street, 5th floor
-Was there anything useful in your experience up until now as a working adult that helped you develop these characters?
Babita Guman, 33, New York, N.Y.
We have our biggest group yet this time around! So click around and come back later to see the Master Linkity List of all the karaokers, which will be updated through the day. And if you want to participate, send me an email. I even made a cute little button for participants to put on their blog.
And what happens on buses to drop my humanity-faith stock value even lower? Cell phones. Cell phones, as I understand it, are a physical representation of Satan’s COCK! When you grip one in your hand, he ejaculates evil all over your face. A hell-sent money shot of pure, unadulterated fucktardedness. You are just a whore in the eyes of the underworld, and thou shalt taketh it all, bitch!
1 -White Stamens Bunch "WOC"
As a special ocassion why not a birthday cake, wedding cake, anniversary cake, Share your talents with us, we would love to see them :)
and just enough windows to shed light on the imported antiques
5 great
I can’t wait to spend a chunk out of my day off from work today with the PT. At least I know where to find her. If she does decide, in fact, to show up.
Dr. cheerlubber here.
possible. Complete details and copy's as well. If the
Wherever the orbit of the moon can reach,
Wednesday: Group 1, Group 2, Group 3 extra work, no team WOD.
Thought about so many times. Discovered in a variety of relationships throughout many years of my life (2004 – ongoing).
At The Roppmgi PIT-INN,Tokyo,Japan
After the squash is steamed, cut it in half and scoop out the seeds and discard. Scoop out the cooked squash and place in a blender with the other ingredients and blend until smooth. Place the soup into a saucepan and warm it up to desired temperature.
My day started with a kid from another 3rd grade class coming to talk to me before school started, to tell me that a boy in ANOTHER 3rd grade class "had pictures of naked women in his backpack!"
Most fans agree that the best Star Wars film was The Empire Strikes Back. Is it any coincidence that Empire Strikes Back is the film that features Han on the Millenium Falcon the most?
After what may have been hours, he had covered what seemed like four walls, each about twenty steps long, or forty feet, with nothing that could be an opening or entrance. His steps were more confident, but they were also along the wall. He moved to a corner and counted two steps along a wall, and then turned at what he thought was a ninety-degree angle. He stepped forward slowly, again tossing the rock, again with two thumps, but the hard part was feeling around and finding the rock each time. When he got to the other side, he turned along the wall for two steps and then made another ninety-degree angle until he again reached the opposite side.
So I don't have a HUGE amount of confidence in myself. I mean, I don't do too badly, but I'm not the most confident person. So every time I get to almost finish all the orders that have been waiting I think ''Surely that's it right? My work can't be good enough, or popular enough to have more people wanting them, surely?'' And every time, without fail, when I get to the end of my wait list, I find another little email from another bereaved mum, requesting something beautiful to honor their baby, or their friend's baby.
I was advised to drink lots of water and take the iron tablets…. to try again in 2 weeks time … huhu!
Switching gears now: I guess since The Social Network is premiering tonight, it is appropriate to state the following:
Just a word of advice... Do not weigh yourself every day if you are going to do this. Trust me. I have weighed myself every day for 21 days now & it has honestly been the most stressful part. My weight has fluctuated every single day, up, down, the same, you name it I have seen it on the scale the last couple of weeks. It is not fun at all... If you are going to learn anything from reading this blog, I think its that.
So this part’s neat. I’m looking to see how to fold in the idea I’m calling “dead not dreaming”. See what it does to the story if the crew aren’t hibernating between stars, but are actually dead and then regrown for each new planet. I think mostly it can work, and it’s exciting to me, which all by itself is enough. It might even be original. I don’t know. I do know that I’m not riffing off some known trope that I loved as a child. Whether something from the SciFi channel used it in a show I never watched, that’s entirely possible. Am hoping not.
I stood up when he did, and before I turned back toward the house, he grabbed my hand.
this kid matt came to visit us last week, it was so awesome.
“Prunes and custard followed. And if anyone complains that prunes, even when mitigated by custard, are an uncharitable vegetable (fruit they are not), stringy as a miser's heart and exuding a fluid such as might run in misers' veins who have denied themselves wine and warmth for eighty years and yet not given to the poor, he should reflect that there are people whose charity embraces even the prune . . . One cannot think well, love well, sleep well, if one has not dined well. The lamp in the spine does not light on beef and prunes.”
43. Tears and mucus contain an enzyme (lysozyme) that breaks down the cell wall of many bacteria.
Veterinary surgeon Andrew Valencia told the court he had instantly discovered the wound, which was caused by an elastic hair band which had been placed around her neck and had been acting like a saw for anything up to a week.
I thought that the first two movements were particularly fine.
I kind of s..t..r..e..t..c..h..e..d the sketch this week. Here's it is if you're interested in heading over to The Outlawz to join in:
I think that if you are ever spoken to by God, Mother Nature, or your Larger self, you might not hear a voice per se.
This was a free shoot I did to spend time with Rachel, and show her how amazingly beautiful she is. I mean, this girl can work a camera like no one I have met before.
In my mind it's the key to her glamorous hotel room right smack in the middle of Paris.
I know that sounded rushed but, believe me, that’s about as fast as it happened.
James is a soldier during World War II working along the French border. This story follows his journey through a confusing battle against the French. He soon becomes friends with a man named David and together they traverse the difficulties of a soldiers life; coping with harsh conditions, missing relatives, and trying to come to terms with murdering men.
Rhubarb and Custard Kinda Soufflé Recipe
It's not glossing over a struggle or potential issue we might be facing with this baby.
Oh yeah…I know.
Apparently, at the end of the evening, they actually did have a horse-drawn carriage for Marshall to make his exit. This was, presumably, incredibly funny.
You can use Pop Dots to pop the letters off the page as I did in the top picture and really give them dimension. The letters are really cute and would look great on your guy pages!! I used them in my configurations box, just created a little pop up stand in back of each letter here. I hope you use these in your projects. I would love to see what you do!!
Phreak: I second that motion, and suggest that they be skins with extra animations yet priced at 900 RP.
Naturopaths are not licensed to perform major surgery, or prescribe narcotics and antidepressant drugs. They must also consult an oncologist when treating a cancer patient.
Immerse yourself in four concerts of adventurous music with leading classical, new and genre-bending artists.
Top establishment leaders including Chairman Puspa Kamal Dahal, Vice Chairman and Prime Minister Baburam Bhattrai participated in the meeting. However, senior leaders of Baidya fraction did not attend the program. About 1,000 ex-combatants have participated in the meeting.
My latest creations are here for viewing and I have had another couple of acceptances in relation to layouts, so I'm thrilled:):):). Keep posted over on the sidebar for more details of the upcoming layouts.
We wanted to sit by the fire with mugs of hot chocolate
If we are ever rise above our animal instincts for survival, wouldn’t it be helpful for responsible people (in all walks of life) to refrain from immediately pushing the red attack button? Would not it be more conducive to promote the our abilities to challenge ourselves to look for ways to be inclusive, understanding and being KIND?
What I did not anticipate about working for RecoveryNowTV is the personal reward that goes along with helping people...making a difference. Recently, many people have contacted me, for advice, or with their personal stories. My words have touched others, inspired them. And others have felt comfortable enough with the work I do to share their story with me. And their stories always inspire me. The power of shared experience in recovery is awesome! I have made so many inspiring personal contacts, too. Through my writing, people have reached out and asked me join some other recovery groups through Facebook, mostly. And on those pages, I have met some really inspiring and beautiful people. (One on my mind right now is Liz, another Sober Hillbilly friend of mine.) I have never felt so rewarded for what I have been doing before. It really is an amazing feeling to know that I am helping people...that my words also touch people.
KZKYF Blog (kzkyfblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
I hope you all had a wonderful Mother's Day! It is that time again.......tomorrow is the 15th and all the ladies at TDIPT have been very busy creating wonderful items. Please pour a cup of your favorite coffee or tea and enjoy all that we have to offer! I have been busy making birds, kitties and fruit!! I hope you find something special, maybe a well deserved extended Mother's Day gift :)
Symphonies 7 & 8
Please just get in touch - annaandtheringlondon@gmail.com
Hopefully, I don't sound like a complaining, pessimist. That is not my intent. Instead, I really wanted to take the opportunity to study my past cards and make them better, and truer to my current style.
The political elite has become adept at using the absence of Eulex investigations as a certificate of its “cleanliness”, as a recent episode demonstrates well. According to a report on organ-trafficking in Kosovo – written by Swiss MP Dick Marty for the Council of Europe – a group of ethnic Albanian fighters, led by the current prime minister, Hashim Thaci, committed unspeakable crimes during
Inevitable, really. Only a year ago I passive-aggressively ask the trade where the Thornbridge stuff is, and now there's more of it coming in than I can keep up with. So, this is a clearance of some stuff that's been sitting in my fridge for too long, plus some more recent acquisitions, all from the über-classy Derbyshire brewery.
Meeko the calf stood nuzzling a pile of hay. He didn’t seem to have much appetite, and he looked a little bored. Every now and then, he glanced up, as though wondering why so many people with clipboards were standing around watching him.
*Everyone may think the “teen” years start and end at a certain age. I say the teen years start at age 13 and go until around 18-20 years old. Then again the young adult could be 14 to 20 years old. That may just be me. And now I feel I have to go over this. There’s baby, toddler, child, and kid which everyone probably knows what they are. I believe a “tween” is 12 and 13 years old. Just saying.
"So what?" you may ask. "We live in a corrupt age, so we have a corrupt government. And not for the first, or the last time."
Judge Goldstone accepted Hines had shown “genuine remorse” but added: “He has, simply but unfortunately, an unhappy tendency to use violence as a way of solving a problem.”
Preheat oven to 375. Spray an 8x8 baking dish with pan spray. Place cubed bread in dish.
In Marcus Garvey, I waited outside in the quiet, semi dark. And in the front yard of one of the shacks I spotted a toilet, vulnerable and stark in the night, gleamed by the rag of moon.
Marty's tabloid
“I will go and look,” said Bantum standing up.
I take pride in cooking my family a nice meal. I am pleased to do Loki’s work, whether it’s writing about Him, or horsing, or teaching someone. That goes for Odin too, to a lesser extent, because it has to go through Loki first. He’s firm on that. I don’t consider that drudgery or oppression, just part of being a good wife. It is my pleasure to do something for the One I love.
Later on I made it to my good friends house with the baby to watch the GA Tech game. To test my supposed allergy to alcohol, I had a nice Left Hand Fade to Black and some Pyramid Howl. I'll have to review them later as we were celebrating Tech getting the big win over the Klan Country's own Clemson Tigers on the way to the ORANGE BOWL BABY!
My Christmas wish is to tell those that left me how I loved them and how I missed their presence in my life.
A struggle I have is when living in the current “chapter” of my life… I tend to wonder and think about the one to come…
And now the first ever NOT From Here Are You? E-chapbook. If you'd like one of your very own, follow the link below the book to the site where you can get the embed code and/or download a PDF version. If you are technically challenged let me know and I'll email one to you along with much ridicule and scorn.
Check out their patient before & after portfolio
The bar at the Tap was perhaps best described as a scrum. The door policy seemed to be basically if you are wearing a football shirt keep it hidden but it was a sea of Wednesday everywhere you turned. Worse still beers were going off (running out) left right and centre.
Cowboy Junkies
We found one apartment that we thought we loved... but upon a closer inspection, we realized that there was d-CON sprinkled liberally in the kitchen corners. READ: there's clearly a rodent problem. Plus, the place was hot as blazes even on a cool evening and we'd have to install our own window A/C. *sigh* We had already applied and were accepted, but ended up turning the place down. I'm still mourning this apartment, as it was cute, had lots of storage, was spacious, cute, and allowed small dogs.
Minty hues have been a favourite this year, I've practically raided and re-raided my closet to pick out the minty colours and wear them with different colour combinations and try out variations. This post has a minty shade too but this time I wore it with black and green. So please do ignore the frowny expressions: I've been drained of my energy. Jeggings are a favourite when it comes to summer because its light yet looks utterly stylish and gives a denim effect, so here I wore my blackish grey jeggings with the mint top and paired it with a shrug. More after the pictures.
We're off. Yee San went off like a bullet, maintaining first all the way through the first lap. Puff, puff. 400m - the longest sprint - was sapping my energy. Lift your knees, Yi Wen! shouts Mr Ravi.
1 1/2 teaspoons dill seed
With Special Guest
1 Peter 2:17 – Honor all men; love the brotherhood, fear God, honor the king.
With gut. In these labyrinthine tubes, in those gallant tunnels which scientists call our second brain, not the brain of facts but of insight. To say it briefly, Ann knows who you really are.
2 exist
The question might be raised, not just with respect to this piece but regarding everything else that I say as well: why should commercial cinema operate with the burden of questioning institutions? Why should there be a deeper level to films at all? what difference does it make whether a film is ‘radical’ enough or not?
This card uses a stamp borrowed from my friend Diane, and I forgot to take a note of the maker. A very simple card as I have been very short of crafting time this last couple of weeks.
* Combine together milk, condensed milk and vanilla essence in a small bowl.
Pocono Manor
March 7th 2012
After I was done taking pictures of the dish, I noticed the sun setting. I get to enjoy sunset every evening. It is impossible for me to miss it since I am someone who likes to pause every now and then to enjoy the beautiful nature, be it the sun, moon or tiny flowers on the road side. I have so many times stood at the window to watch the golden yolk disappear into the horizon. Do you know? It doesn't take too long for the sun to set, it is gone within a few minutes. I was not even fast enough to get decent shots, and this is the best my very old point-and-shoot camera could produce.
I'm not sure what my single friends are thinking, but I can guess it's something like this:
None of the following Breivik related Facebook pages endorse the rule of law and a free and fair trial to be applied in the case of Norway v. Breivik. Nor do any of these pages seemingly bother the Norwegian and English Defense Leagues leadership elite. Why does a page supporting a rule of law free and fair trial for Anders Breivik, bother the English and Norwegian Defense League leadership elite so much?
Here is one of my all time favorite library grooves by the one and only Norwegian film & Television composer, Sven Libaek! Misty Canyon, what a cool track! Deep, moody, groovy, jazzy, dark & spacey... Perfect! You rarely find a track where the bass line & drum beat groove together as naturally as this (plus, what a cool vibraphone solo right?). This track definitely gets dropped every time I spin records. On the other side we've got "Soul Thing". Same overall sound as side one, but this ones a bit more up-tempo with a lighter mood to it. Both tracks originally appeared on Sven Libaek's 1970 Library record "My Thing", which always reminds me sonically of Lee Hazlewood's epic "Cowboy in Sweden" album from the same year, oddly enough. This single was put out by Votary Records from Australia a few months ago. Supposedly they are also working on reissuing the entire album eventually, but even this single kept being pushed back for what seemed like forever, so we'll see when it shows up. You can find this record at www.dustygroove.com, but supplies are limited, so hurry up. After hearing these tracks, can you believe that Sven composed music for Hanna-Barbera cartoons too? Enjoy...
Source: petrochemicals
To consolidate their preeminent position as sources, government and business-news promoters go to great pains to make things easy for news organizations. They provide the media organizations with facilities in which to gather; they give journalists advance copies of speeches and forthcoming reports; they schedule press conferences at hours well-geared to news deadlines; they write press releases in usable language; and they carefully organize their press conferences and “photo opportunity” sessions. It is the job of news officers “to meet the journalist’s scheduled needs with material that their beat agency has generated at its own pace.”
I wanted to make them a special pudding though . . . or, rather I wanted to make the Toddster a special pudding . . . you all know how much he likes pasta of any shape or form . . . and I wanted to make up for the mac and cheese!
sc in corner, sc back up other side.
The Church was formed by a small group of
of the control I forsook when I allowed them free reign,
Ladies, ladies, ladies, WHY? Why do you drag your husbands shopping with you? To get their opinions? They don't have opinions! They don't. What, you say your husband is wonderful and he always compliments you on your clothing? I'll let you in on a little secret. He's simply been trained and knows what to say so he won't be sleeping in the dog house. He doesn't really care if you buy the raw umber, the cinnamon, or the chocolate sweater. He doesn't even know what umber is and if you mention chocolate, he'll just remember that he's hungry and tired of shopping.
There are stories that make you think afterwards. You sit there and just stare at the book (or in my case, the Kindle) in your hands. It is a profound feeling, this period of after-book contemplation. It does not strike me often, and I cherish it when it does.
Of course I know, as I always did, that medicine does not work like this in reality. I know Dr. House would be fired immediately, if even hired at all, for his harsh words and his hatred of authority. If my boss were to treat me the way he treats his staff, I would probably go home in tears every night. I know that even a special team of doctors like House’s wouldn’t be able to perform all the different surgeries they do, and work in the lab, and manage to sit differentials. It’s usually one or the other (or the other).
apt to show it to you today, because this weekend we fly off to Israel and then to the UK. So my bag is packed and I have only 1 very last minute paper flower order to complete before we leave on an exciting holiday.
Now, when you are looking at these pictures, I'd like you to remember that I do NOT look like them, and I never will. Even if I (when I?) make it to my goal weight. It's not my goal to be super thin.
I have finally realised that the grass probably isn’t greener on the other side and to be extremely happy and grateful for what and who I have in my life.
Tech $Billionaires Want to Be Space $Trillionaires - Asteroid mining will make $trillions of resources available. So far this is beyond the reach of any government so who are they going to pay taxes to?
This book is action packed. There's not a moment of it that is dull. Not only are the scenes full of adrenaline, they are easy to envision. I found myself taking notes for the battle scenes in my own books, but I don't think I could ever match ANGELFIRE.
The steep walls of Canyon de Chelly were carved by the ever changing harsh weather of the desert. For many centuries, Canyon de Chelly provided a home for the Navajo populace. With its rich soil, many streams, plants, and animals who roamed the lands, the families who lived there felt safe from the world around them. In 1806, Lt. Antonio Narbona’s military attacked the unsuspecting Navajo people and lead to their defeat. The Navajos were escorted to Bosque Redondo, New Mexico. Today, Navajo families make their homes, raise livestock, and farm the lands in the canyon.
Adam Wheeler, currently in his third year at McGill University, speaks to Professor Jodi Kim about her book, Ends of Empire, and about the forthcoming conference entitled “Critical Ethnic Studies and the Future of Genocide: Settler Colonialism/Heteropatriarchy/White Supremacy.”
snarl or Morrissey's plummy plaintiveness. Like the above, Kate
to the accidental ballroom music...
SONISPHERE
‘Cause she’ll teach you to cry
This is a good thing. If people won’t listen to you then no one is going to buy from you and ultimately you’ll find yourself in a lonely life wondering what is going wrong. Maybe you feel lonely now and this information is hitting a little close to home. If you find yourself lonely on a regular basis ask yourself if people are rejecting you or your ideas? Knowing your buyer is huge in making sales. And if you are not making sales then you either need to change your buyers or change your pitch. Sometimes you even have to do a little of both.
It's already Monday! Didn't we just have Monday?
(a) Executive Order No. 12778 Principles of Ethical Conduct for Government Officers and Employees; October 23, 1991
2. Who’s your favourite author and which book by that author do you like best?
Couper said his fourth big concern is officers being discourteous in their interactions with the public
His win at the Bay Hill two weeks ago was his first on the PGA Tour for over two years. Bringing pundits and patrons alike to consider Woods as a contestant for this prestigious silverware.
At the end of 2007 I did not put my name forward again for the Advisory Council as Councillors’ Liaison Officer. My requests for assistance for councillors had fallen on deaf ears, so I decided instead to focus my efforts on the following year’s GLA/mayoral election campaign.
Three planets influence the first house in this chart: Mars and the Sun do because they are 7 signs away in Cancer. And Saturn also influences the first house as a result of his influence on the 10th sign from himself.
Socialite Nicole Richie and designer John Varvatos were photographed as they made an appearance on Extra to promote their NBC competition series at The Grove on Friday (March 9) in Los Angeles, California.
Taliesin is a book by Stephen R. Lawhead. I received a copy not long after it was first published in 1987. I never read it then. It was recommended to my mother as described as something comparable to C.S. Lewis and she gave me the book. I got several pages into it several times, but never could really get into it.
he'd seen the other world
Something for the sport and meet promoters to consider as they look for ways to draw attention to the sport.
Thank you Tara for writing out your post this morning, it allowed me to write out my thoughts and process more!
Cooling for the radiators is via the Red Bull style tail funnel, or ‘Tulip’ exits as Green describes it.
But I knew where the car was. I ran all the way back to the car, even though it was Ellen's car. But I couldn't open the door, and no one was there. I was sad and scared. I sat down beside the car and barked. I barked and barked and barked until my voice was squeaky.
I might as well be naked, may as well have two heads or a fuckin' tail!
Who is speaking here? Isaiah. (It is interesting that the person speaking in the book of Isaiah changes very frequently.)
Part IV of Marsi's continuing series on drainage and bloating -- talk about value-added.
Hhmm....there seems to be a purple theme this week, doesn't there?
which is one of my favorite areas in the Galilee area.
Well, enough about OUR Dwarf Hamster, per say. Here’s a rundown of facts regarding the Dwarf Hamster… via a Tripod page about the Russian version of the species. I’m picking through and posting the more interesting ones (to me lol). To see them all, just click on the underlined link.
Dear Ms. Feverfew -
The station is positioned to support the eventual operation of the Detroit to Chicago High Speed Rail Corridor, which already has seen progress in western Michigan.
This is analogous to the public humiliating by Maulana Mufti and a talk show host of Veena Malik for her candid moments with Ashmit Patel on the Indian reality Show, "Bigg Boss" - a virtual flogging of sorts for public consumption - which she brought upon herself, according to the rape myth, because she acted like a slut.
The room is pitch black. Brendan is taller, stronger, and too intent on kissing Stephen to permit any protest. Metal cuffs snap around Stephen’s wrists. Ready or not, it’s time to obey…
Even the “final” face-off between Punk and HHH bored me because they more or less said the same thing, and I hate that added stipulation with HHH being removed C.O.O. Hell, he just started that role, yet you want him gone already? Why is that exactly? But I will say at least Phil Brooks gave Paul Levesque what Paul wanted. For Phil to lay the pipebomb on him.
God has the Genesis one perspective that we don’t have the luxury of. He sees, beyond that knows our future, He knows both paths, He knows which He wills for us and even which we will choose. He’s read the ‘choose your own adventure’ book of our lives but even better than that, He lives in us and so lovingly longs to live through us.
Kapp KL-1071
There is so much, I wish to change, that when this contest http://facebook.com/sftimetochange came up, I went berserk with ideas. The education system, the state of our hospitals, the gender equations within our homes, the crime against women, the disgusting state of our cities, the corruption in our bureaucracy, the sloth of our legal system, the filth in our political parties…… the list was endless. There was no way I could write about all of this! without boring everyone to death. So here is what I did! I changed the Newspaper!!!
Not wanting to pull out the silly things from my backpack, I got the money from Branden, went to my usual butchers for pork chops, sausages, and ground beef, and headed home. When Branden came home from work, I showed him the molds. He giggled a bit and pointed out that the 'sticks' that you hold were actually 'ears'...bunny ears to be exact.
The ways of destroying the church are many and colorful. Raw factionalism will do it. Rank heresy will do it. Taking your eyes off the cross and letter other, more peripheral matters dominate the agenda will do it–admittedly more slowly than frank heresy, but just as effectively on the long haul. Building the church with superficial ‘conversions’ and wonderful programs that rarely bring people into a deepening knowledge of the living God will do it. Entertaining people to death but never fostering the beauty of holiness or the centrality of self-crucifying love will build an assembly of religious people, but it will destroy the church of the living God. Gossip, prayerlessness, bitterness, sustained biblical illiteracy, self-promotion, materialism–all of these things, and many more, can destroy a church. And to do so is dangerous: ‘If anyone destroys God’s temple, God will destroy him; for God’s temple is sacred, and you are that temple’ (1 Cor. 3:17). It is a fearful thing to fall into the hands of the living God. (83-84
The line moved like The Roadrunner with Wile E. Coyote on his ass. We were inside that building in a flash. I wooden-smiled my way up to the reception desk. She looked at my letter and told me to go RIGHT UPSTAIRS TO THE DOCTOR. Everyone else had to wait. Holy shit!
Category: How-To
H: Hawaii~Hawaii became a state when I was a pre-schooler. My mom was a stewardess before I was born and she flew to Hawaii. That is where my parents honeymooned, too. someday I hope to see Hawaii.
I have sadly lost several birds this fall. Gone are Betty and Agnes, followed by the only duck I hadn't named, the small black Runner female. Then Rosy got sick and I found her dead last Monday, she is buried by Gary. Helen disappeared next, she was a Black Swedish duck who loved her Cheerios, and clamored for them every morning. Saffron disappeared next, and she was the one bird I thought had the best survival instincts, I figured she of all my chickens would be wise enough to sense danger before it was too late, I was wrong I guess. Now my Mallard duck Goldy is gone, she was Gary's mate and I enjoyed watching her antics as she begged for treats. Yesterday, I lost one of my exhibition birds Ash, she was a blue Cochin, just about 7 months old, next year I was going to be entering her and her sister Smoke ( get it, Smoke and Ash???... I thought it kind of cool if you say it fast....) in some poultry competitions. I am trying to keep my girls safe, but I think coyote has discovered the reliable feast available to him during the day at the Erickson farm. I don't lose birds at night, only when they free range during the day.
Oh and start my warping plan for my loom, I finally found something that should work as a warp divider so I can get weaving again and after my talk about spinning at guild tonight I should have some fun stuff to put on the wheel.
Dorian Concept – Toothbrush
Its nothing that will stand out but its not disappointing either. I wouldn't say you should seek it out but for any ticker you'll get a good session bitter alongside that tick.
But not only that – what they tell us about England 2024.
After food and, crucially, drink, the younger folk went kicking a ball about in the gardens whilst I busied myself photographing the fornicating ladybirds you see above. Rampant sex on OccupiedCountry's blog? Who'd a thunk it?
22nd Nov 1983 Bannockburn Tamdhu
drinks were water, pink lemonade, and beer (for the grownups, of course).
He didn’t look away when Norma wrapped her arm around his waist. She fit in his arm exactly as his mother did, with her head in the crook of his shoulder.
-Velma D. BATES.
China, one of the world’s biggest greenhouse gas emissions producers, recently overtook the US as the world’s top car market.
I’m not really a fan of movie art books. In fact I own a grand total of zero, but I am quite impressed by the visuals on this film. Enough to make this art-book a definite possibility.
-Monday is a heavy strength training circuit day plus a interval run for cardio
N was in complete control. No matter what caused me to blow up, I would apologise, give in and beg for forgiveness. It was my mother all over again. At one point, things got bad enough that I (notice I didn’t say we) got counselling and was treated for depression. I learned to control things, and we began to thrive. This coincided with my ability to work massive amounts of overtime and make an awfully good living for the family.
And then we wandered to the back area where there seemed to be some sort of live entertainment...and found that they had the dance performances I had so missed at the Thai Town fest!! LOVED the beautiful, graceful traditional dancing backed by classic Thai instruments. (And loved that most people in the audience were from the Thai community, out to support!)
let us dance with all the species
67 Jude the Obscure – Thomas Hardy
4. You will also enjoy using fresh water for taking a bath. Keep in mind that unfiltered water could have harmful chemicals that could harm your skin and a possibility that you could absorb the chemicals in your water supply.
to pregnancy, childbirth and the early postpartum period. My education in c=
Thank you, Monelle!
Earlier this week Camra's monthly newspaper was released & it contained an article written by Camra's very own messiah Mr Roger Protz the Editor of the Good Beer Guide. These are excerpts from his article:-
Category 1~Any EvaDress pattern garment project that you have only thought about doing, but never took on. When you submit in this category, tell us why you only dreamed about doing the project and never made it. For example, perhaps your technical or pattern grading skills just weren't there yet.
Enough of the enemy has closed that their few shots aren’t going to make much of a difference so it’s time to run and hide- boosting far to the opposite ends of the table, out of harm’s way of everything where they wait.
Surprise...Surprise
1103 ***D-III/26/1991. “Queries about the Oresteia and the Pursuit of Justice.” Political Science Department, The University of Texas, Austin, Texas. (Incorporated in Item C-1991(4), above, pp. 816-21, 1042-43, and in Item B-15 (Projected), above, pp 61-66, 69-70 (2004).)
They can never come at an untimely hour. He is never too busy to see them and to listen to their words of love and prayer.
As parents of little kids I reckon the stress can be split in half between sleep stress and eating stress.
Frank Zappa - guitar, vocals
Today has been a monster awareness day of admitting that I give very little emotionally or physically to anyone. Even how I give to friends has become quite limited and neat. It is time for me to start dancing naked in the pie chart of my life: To jump from segment to segment like a wild toddler after a gallon of red cordial. It is time to stop waiting for the world to make me feel better. It is time to grow up and stop expecting others to take care of my needs. It is time to seize every single second as an opportunity to give and be love on this planet. How can I honestly expect life to be generous to me when I am so insular? Planet earth: Welcome. I’m stepping aboard.
No, replied Schick.
It’s not. So if you’ve got to drop a verbal Hiroshima on someone’s ass, I am the last person to tell you to clean that mouth out with soap. Please, by all means, go for it. But don’t insult my vagina and my sister’s vaginas while doing it. That’s unnecessary. Objectifying a woman’s parts like that leads to her de-humanization. Which leads to people feeling validated when they commit violence (verbal and physical) against her. I’m not making this shit up. There are studies that connect these two realities.
Professor : Flawed? Can you explain how?
larger than life, and approaching with what feels
Dr. Ish
Nevertheless, the Federal Circuit struck down the ’826 patent this past July on double-patenting grounds, holding that a patent is invalid if it claims a method of using a chemical compound if that method was described (even if not claimed) in an earlier patent.
Here, however, we’ve seen the beginnings of a useful messaging infrastructure between a server and a browser. Interesting!
What is always a treat and I wish I had gotten to speak with him more was spending some time with Voltaire. After his late night show Saturday, which meant I was on campus until 2:30am, I got to hang around as he was packing up and listen to him ramble about stories and such. I was able to do that last year more when I was acting as Temp liason when his son and him had arrived on campus, which was a really nice treat. Both of them are really cool and it was a shame his son couldn’t make it and that I couldn’t see them more. But even a few off handed stories at 2am were worth it. Sadly in a weird way the other event I was at ran over which is what prevented me from going to see Voltaire. Next year perhaps.
That said, let me catch y'all up a little bit on what's been going on in my lil' ol' life.
In any case, that was the deathstroke for Pamela. I suppose one could do a deeper reading where one examines the second half of the novel for evidence of Pamela’s Stockholm Syndrome (or, oh! Even the idea that her concussion left her with brain damage! Or the idea that she’s trying to game the system!), but without Pamela’s strong moral compass, the exploitation is downright horrifying. (Well into their marriage, Pamela calls Mr. B “master”, and he even gives her forty-seven detailed rules on how to be a proper wife. I want to peel my skin off.) There’s plenty of rich territory for us to explore here as a class (I imagine I’ll write a paper or two on Pamela), but as a novel one might read for entertainment or even education (which was Richardson’s goal with Pamela), oh my sweet Lord, avoid it.
You can find further information below:
I have been absent from the blog for a couple of weeks and I apologize. The reason? On June 20, we experienced a tornado that removed a section of the roof, blew in a patio door (the same one pictured in “The Bull In the Window“), knocked down our irrigation pivot, and destroyed many of the biggest trees on our farm. This blog is meant to be a lighthearted look at farm life and so I’ll stick with that theme. I’m fortunate to have that luxury–no one was hurt and I’m aware of many people that have experienced much worse at the hand of Mother Nature this year.
After about a mile I hang a left towards Evangeline Downs. Twisting on the throttle, I roll down the boulevard that leads to the racetrack. Though it is pretty early in the morning there already are a few jockeys leisurely riding their horses. While parking close to the track I wonder who is being warmed up, the jockeys or the quarter-horses.
In the 1920s and 1930s, Girl Scouts all across the country baked their own simple sugar cookies with their mothers. They then packaged their coookies in wax paper bags sealed with a sticker and sold them door-to-door for 25 to 35 cents a dozen.
In the words of the hairy Fab Four of yesteryear: “Let it be.”
7:30 - 7:32 AM: I realize I should've gotten a Starbucks as I stare in space sitting in my desk chair.
61. Go to a shrimp boil
Sergeant James Gill, who previously commented about two female protesters arrested at a controversial Shell gas project in Co Mayo will now not be charged as he has retired.
¾ cup wheat germ
The confluence of knowledge, understanding and practise makes life complete. When you grow into higher states of consciousness, you find that you are no longer thrown off balance by different situations and disturbances. You become beautiful yet strong – a soft, delicate and beautiful blossom capable of accommodating different values in life without any conditions.
I can't wait to see what gorgeous creations you come up with for this challenge. The DT have made some gorgeous samples so don't forget to hop on over to the challenge blog and check them all out.
An empty glass, formerly occupied by Nut Before Christmas Nut Brown Ale.
Soaking the rich — relying heavily on them for income taxes — has resulted in a precarious revenue roller coaster ride. It’s either boom or bust in Sacramento, depending on how the wealthy are faring in the stock market and their other investments.
4. Remove the paper backing from the fabric. Place the pattern piece on the sticky side of the fabric and cut around it.
Here is a line from her preface:
Now back then we was a small town, and our main street was no more than a block long. The post office sat on one end and a drugstore next to it. Our water tower located us. Noted for skunks, we was also known for football. Go gophers! It was with great satisfaction that we skunked our rivals.
A test witnessed as part of a BBC Click investigation suggests even those with up-to-date anti-virus software could be at risk.
Today's book tour stop is a review. There are so many people reading A Story of the West who say they don't normally read books set during this time period (1880s American West), but who really like my book. I say, if it's a good story, the setting becomes secondary.
And all their stupid mind screams is, “What if I could bump into her again at a party, or someplace? If she remembers me, then I could probably make the move if she’s close enough…”
But what I care to worship
How do you tan? Let us know!
the history of dead kings, perhaps,
the love scent in your life
smiley face button
TV host: Forbidden, then.
Know someone who is interested in Domo? Please refer them to me! :) I'm not sure how this will all pan out, it's just an experiment, but I thought it'd be fun to try!
numbers imaginary, like any marks
It is gratifying that two of Stephen Lawrence's racist killers have been convicted, but as they were part of a five strong gang and have eluded justice for 18 years, it is far too little far too late.
It just happened that the DJ decided to play a somewhat dirty/raunchy song. So we danced like sluts. I knew he wanted to make out, and I definitely wanted to as well.
That holds the eluded scavengers.
Here’s Option Number Two, located a few feet back from the Starter House. It’s a pretty traditional, made-from-a-kit bird house, and the two of them moved into it last year for their last set of babies. More scenic? Cooler? Fewer bears?
‘These are immigrant taxpayers whose average annual wages are $21,240 and generate far more for the Social Security system in payroll taxes than any refunds they receive. Yet their children, many of whom are U.S. citizens, would lose out’.
According to a recent Attorney General report 47,515 drug-related killings occurred from December 2006, when President Felipe Calderón deployed thousands of troops to drug hot spots, through September 2011. The violent death and senseless destruction caused by the Mexican drug cartel has reached a critical stage. Action must be taken to protect the lives of innocent unarmed people of Mexico. It is only a matter of time before the bloodshed flows north to America.
Ah yes, photos! Here they are:
Her father picked up the pot of Mac & cheese.
Thanks to Tim for his faith in me and thanks to all those Berwick beer lovers who have stuck with it and made these dinners not just the only regular beer dinners around, but probably the most fun as well.
Allen hears and nods yes
and spent at least 30 unexpected minutes scrolling down, pressing the next button.
Bowles, K 2012. Lecture material from BCM310 and MACS225.
Stamps: Make New Friends (retired Close To My Heart) Girl Power (retired Stampin' Up)
Long had I walk’d my cities, my country roads through farms, only
Ok, so I haven't even attempted to make sourdough bread or propagate my own plants, but I have doubled the amount of vegies I eat and you can find me at the pool before the kids are awake three times a week. I've lost 8.5 kilos, and counting. The TV habit is broken, instead I usually read or sew at night.
It was the closest I came to resigning.
this ghost of November has been set free
27.虫
- The Isle of Dread: Gods, this is the "classic" module I most want to run but never have. That dino on the cover has always appealed to me, as does the module's open-ended "sandboxy" nature. Viva Moldvay!
I'm talking 70 degrees, gentle breeze (as opposed to the crazy ass wind that's been rearing its ugly head lately), no humidity.
It's a hard thing to do, but the result will be more beautiful than we can imagine.
-Rocking if you aren't already sleepy.
Using the information from the French, Rejewski turned to a branch of pure mathematics called the ‘theory of permutations and groups’ and very soon the first decryptions began to emerge. Over the next six years the Polish Cipher Bureau decrypted upwards of 75% of the German signal traffic.
Some partial scholarships are available.
I felt like Cinderella at the Ball.
I can almost, almost, giggle at recently receiving TWO blood-relative communications addressed to the wrong name.
Charlotte Chadderton, University of East London, London, England: UK secondary schools under surveillance: What are the implications for race? A Critical Race and Butlerian analysis
“It is not the usual banter and she is not enthusiastic for her line,” said one poster. “The host is selling it. I thought it odd her mom had to come out, but she must need that reassurance.”
Wepener farmer Stef Buys says about half of a 8km razor wire fence he himself erected at a cost of R30,000 was “quickly destroyed by criminal elements crossing from Lesotho”. Breytenbach adds he has private guards costing him some R25,000 per month. As is, he as lost many sheep and cattle to rustlers in recent months. He can no longer use some 1500 hectares of grazing land on his farm because the livestock would just get slaughtered or rustled away.
If you’re miserable in your job, do yourself and everyone else a favor: quit.
ZCORR FSP Bags™ utilize a combination of Vapor Phase Corrosion Inhibitor (VpCI) chemistry and barrier packaging materials to completely prevent the corrosion of your firearms and ammunition. The material that ZCORR FSP Bags™ are manufactured with is a proprietary lamination of materials that conjointly yield anti-corrosion properties that have not been commercially available until now.
I have been leaning towards using my Promethean for calendar. I've been looking around different blogs and saw that many teachers are having students use calendar books to keep them engaged during calendar time. I think that is a great idea and I think I will be trying that this year.
Oh we managed to find a halal restaurant in Chatuchak Market. Look at the arrows on the above picture. But you need to wait for a while to get a table.
Lets just say some nasty events happen that are beyond the girls’ control. A fight breaks out and several people are wounded and dying. These would be the turning point where one of the ladies gets out and fights her way through.
and making zero effort to take off my clothes –or his!!
1 Thessalonians 1:1-10 – Introduction and Thanksgiving
Goober& The Peas
Xia Y, Bian Q, Xu L, Cheng S, Song L, Liu J, Wu W, Wang S, Wang X. Genotoxic effects on human spermatozoa among pesticide factory workers exposed to fenvalerate. Toxicology 2004; 203: 49-60.
I’d still like to do something to say thank-you… we need a fresh idea, though.
Now, do I have problems with the law? Perhaps.
By Stan Butler
-Do at least 5 cultural things this year (museums, plays, etc.)
I felt like watching an episode of Charmed after this episode ended. And I still do. Maybe I’ll do it tomorrow. In the meantime, I still want something to cleanse my mind of Do Not Go Gentle. So why not talk about other shows?!
Q: (Peter Windsor – Clarkesport) Fernando, where would you place the Ferrari now in terms of fast and slow speed performance, perhaps relative to Red Bull or indeed relative to where you were four races ago?
Love Zombies (1980)
100 copies Blue multicolour LP
“In fixing the quantum, the government is always mindful of its repercussions on the country’s financial position. Any salary increase will also involve pension calculations and certain allowances.
Jerome: There partook five thousand who had reached maturity; for women and children, the weaker sex, and the tender age, were unworthy of number; thus in the book of Numbers, slaves, women, children, and an undistinguished crowd, are passed over unnumbered.
On the way home he looked over their notes again. For appearance, they had given him a seven – although the woman with the spiky handwriting had needled, Beard Scruffy. It stung, but less than their other barbs. His lap was Unaccommodating; the twinkle in his eyes Lacked Conviction.
Most days, I nag them to the point we all shed tears. I ask them multiple times each morning: “Do you have your phone, lunch, field trip forms? ”Wear a jacket – I know the calendar says mid-May but this is CANADA, honey and yes that is snow on the ground…” I’m a failure as a mother when they forget something or if they are not absolutely prepared every day for anything. At night when the lights are out, I struggle to un-clench my jaw. I recite the number of continents and states in the U.S.
COMPOSITE BRO SCORE: 2.875 BROS
His first play: The Restoration of Arnold Middleton (1966) was on the breakdown of a schoolteacher Home(1970)is set in a mental hospital but the location is only revealed gradually as the story proceeds. There are five characters including apparently benign Harry, opinionated Jack, cynical Marjorie, and flirtatious Kathleen. As we are shown their interactions we realise their delusions and pretensions are similar to those of people living in normal life. This is a poignant evocation of the passing of a way of life - the subtext of most of these plays . In several of his works but more so here, Storey achieves an elegaic quality that has been compared to the mood of Chekov’s last plays. Home has little plot; it is the carrying through of a process of a dramatic image of growth and decay, rise and fall, advance and retreat. Two well-spoken, gentlemen, approaching old-age meet coarse working-class women and try to establish a relationship with them but fail. At the end they are alone again, back on the deserted terrace where we found them, weeping quietly together.
“Then I expect they and their belongings will be getting very wet.” He looked at her soberly. “There’s nothing can be done. They’ve weathered many such storms since being evicted from the castle.”
What in the feck has happened to customer service? Why does it feel like I’m on this horrible abortion of a show, every time I call a service provider to ask for something?
I know that I’m lucky to have him, and that if we just have him that will be A-OK. But I am stressed about starting to try again now, and my cavalier attitude of “it worked before, so it should work again!” is sort of in the crapper. Before today, I was sort of thinking I was not ready for another pregnancy and all the anxiety and stress that would come with it, not to mention the whole having both an infant and toddler to take care of thing. Now I feel like I need to get this show on the road.
In an editorial, Stockholm daily Svenska Dagbladet said police have to become better at protecting themselves and their property "or they won't be able to protect society and citizens."
I woke up with hunger pains this morning...a very rare occurrence ...so going to have some toast with marmite...in minute, as wanted to pop on to show you this cutie from Crafty Sentiment Designs
Before I left work I took the time to change clothes and freshen up. I am a firm believer in dressing up for the theater, not to mention that we were going to be eating dinner at a fairly nice restaurant. Allow me to present you with an image of what I looked like so that you can have the best mental image possible.
Antifederalists did not want to engage in future arguments about what those rights of the people were, or have to fight their government to retain them. Instead, they insisted that the protections limiting the state governments found in the existing American state bills of rights be added to the Constitution as a Federal Bill of Rights. Thus, their rights would be part of the law of the land, and every government official would have to take an oath to uphold them. Violations by the government of the rights of the people would be plain to all and would authorize the people to defend their rights by defending the supreme law of the land against the officials who were actually violating it.
"..., I taught martial arts. I have skills, this just isn't my time. But, my time will come."
Landini
All his detractors will flee the country and live in exile when he becomes the President. But Mr. Lalit Modi won’t indulge in any kind of political vendetta. On the other hand, he will pursue them to return to the country by rolling a red carpet upon their arrival. Mr. Modi is a kind soul who wants every human being on earth to prosper and enjoy. This is precisely why he gifted IPL to his countrymen by bringing together players, coaches and commentators from across the world.
Customer reviews of California Los Angeles Ucla – University Of Competitor Mother Of Pearl – Two-tone Band – Women’s College Watches are available in the merchant’s website, check it by click on the link below.
Sat-AM: 1:58, 3200'
Anyway...... back to the swap, I seem to have wandered off here! So, I sent Steph this.....
It is at this point in the narrative that I must nod in the direction of those of my critics who accuse me of being an apologist for Zionism, and admit that it is impossible to ignore the Jewish role in the early efforts to undermine Western Society. Jews featured disproportionately amongst those who took Marxist theory forward and set up the great and deadly Communist monoliths which crushed vast sections of humanity, throughout the twentieth century. A significant majority of those who formed the subversive Frankfurt School of thinking in the 1930's, those who developed critical theory and that most evil and damaging of all ideologies, political correctness were Jewish academics and Jewish political thinkers.
1 bases
This is a form rejection despite impressive publication credentials. I have no sense of the plot, and that's absolutely critical in a thriller. I have no sense of the antagonist either.
Raw rice- 2 cups
So what does this have to do with health, fitness or nutrition? Everything knowing who you are and that you have a reason for being makes you want to be healthy and alive to experience all that the Great Creator has for you. The body is the vessel, the tool that all things flow through. To be at peace within yourself makes life so much more peaceful. Peace in mind makes the body at ease. Since most disease/ illness comes from stress a mind and body at ease can not hold onto disease.
Its been a while since I’ve been up to doing What I’m loving Wednesday but I am finally loving enough to have something to share! Be sure to link up with Jamie and let us know what YOU are loving today!
Would Eggleston have felt the need to make new prints if there was an artist’s resale right across all States (and one which was adequately enforced)? All the large price tags have been in relation to recent sales of old prints (none of which, as I understand it, were still in the artist’s possession although one was purchased from Willliam Eggleston III).
As HoD, I always defended the principle that a modern foreign language should be a core subject: languages for all was my motto. However, the practicalities of teaching GCSE French to this particular group of 14-year-olds usually gave me cause to doubt myself – these kids loved PE, Drama and DT but did not feel at home in a languages classroom. On more than one occasion, when trying, for example, to stop them giggling when I said, ‘oui, oui’, I would give serious consideration to the concept of faking a heart attack, just to get out of their company.
though I'm no wolf by blood.
This is the original branch of K&C, housed in the old Queen of Hearts bakery – but there are now five other K&C branches in central London.
Here are 9 bodacious ways to practice self-care:
(According to my mother in law, by hearing the sound like
She was a writer and a feminist; if there had been paparazzi around in her time they would have been stationary outside her house snapping the rich and famous that clustered around her. She would sometimes dress as a man and had a string of lovers, both male and female. However, the love of her life was the composer Chopin. Trust me, if you stopped a French person in the street and asked them who George Sand was, they would know.
We face many challenges. Increasing political polarization. Social mobility and income inequality at previous highs and increasing. Government finances at the brink of disaster, with an aging population likely to push it over the brink. New competitors abroad, an unprofitable faux-Empire, and political near-paralysis at home. Rotten boroughs dominated the Senate. The only thing upon which both parties agree is that we need foreign wars (bringing little or no benefit) and a military apparatus grossly disproportionate to the size of our actual or potential enemies (see this for details). In the future lies peak oil and other perils.
Her husband had his window down and asked if we’d voted for Obama. We told him we had and we’d actually been at the official democratic watch-party downtown to watch the results. He said he had bi-racial children and was excited Obama would be in the White House, because it meant he possessed more hope for his kids than before.
So. Episode one. ‘Partners in Crime’. Any good?
As I have found with other west coast brews, Rogue comes in with big flavor (a lot like Stone, Full Sail, etc). Not a bad thing when done right, and this beer was done right. It wasn't my favorite beer and I am not going to be rushing out to buy a 6 pack, even though I think that some of my friends could enjoy this beer, especially those who aren't hop heads. I believe that Dead Guy Ale is a much better beer to drink, but all in all, this turned out to be a nice surprise for me and I will definitely try it again.
Cut in half and devour!
This book made it all worth while.
Second, he was tired of looking at it on the bathroom counter for 3 days and wanted to see how long it would take for us to notice. lol.
­In the Chinese city of Xian, a carton of luxury Good Cat cigarettes goes for no less than $889. Shop assistants say that despite the exorbitant price, the cigarettes sell quite well, mainly as gifts. This has led to speculation that Good Cats are used to bribe officials.
Couper said he is concerned about police resorting to violence as their first option in dealing with situations. He pointed to actions by some police during the recent occupy protests around the country.
Ethiopia just to mention a few.
So the yummy murigakka upperi is ready to serve
We sipped Bahama Mamas and ate the snacks I had packed, in between swimming in the beautiful water. We felt the Caribbean vibe from the music that was playing from the concession stands (and all of the gorgeous white sand and blue water!). Of all three ports we visited, it was also the only one where we were left unsolicited by beach vendors, which made it very relaxing. We headed back to the ship for a hearty lunch and anticipated the (amazing) dance show that is the highlight of the ship's entertainment line-up.
neither does it spin.
Multicultural Hub Melbourne – Green Room, 506 Elizabeth Street (opposite the Queen Victoria Market)
4. Repeat procedure with remaining pot stickers, oil and broth.
We passed by these roads and grounds today and some of the sections intended by Tuxen are there, albeit in a more modern theme. The civic buildings never appeared. By the time the area was being developed in the 70's and 80's, there was no need for them. Remember this Estate was designed before much of the area had been developed but it got lost in time and as more land was required, it was opened up.
Every time we read such stories, we are told that there is a 'resurgence', and the stories have a tone of urgency, as if the country is in danger from crazed 'right-wing extremist gun-toting haters'.
*Heal excema – can be applied topically to soften the skin
I know I do it.
I'm going quirky with this post. What better forum to get crazy and silly. Since I'm writing this late at night, it's kind of like a pj party and all the giggly stuff is coming out. Hold your pillows until the end please...
When the peppers had been cooking for a bit, I added the eggs, reduced the heat and gave them a good stir to combine everything. Even though I had used three eggs, it still looked as if I was having peppers with a side of eggs for breakfast.
Bill: I love animals and used to write a newsletter about greyhound racing years ago. I also worked at a greyhound track as an announcer and publicity writer years ago (Plainfield Greyhound Park). They are beautiful animals and there are a lot of people who love them in the racing business and there are a lot of people who don't like the racing, but are equally as passionate about caring for greyhounds. I wanted to look at both sides and also to write a book that a family could enjoy to learn more about greyhounds.
Isn’t this essentially the same policy that Republican Senate Majority Leader Bill Frist was proposing in October 2006 when he said that the Afghan Taliban couldn’t be defeated militarily and that the U.S. should bring “people who call themselves Taliban” into the Afghan government? Why have we waited almost six years to adopt this policy? Are we really going to get a much better deal now than we could have had six years ago? If so, will the difference be sufficient to justify the additional sacrifice of the last six years?
UPCOMING PRIVATE SESSIONS PREMIERES:
END LETTER
Chill dough for an hour.
The European Union decided last week to suspend most of its economic sanctions against Myanmar for a year, but left an arms embargo in place.
Guess where we went yesterday? The beach. It was in between lots of other activities, and the teachers had prepped the kids for weeks, telling them they absolutely, positively could not get near the water.
Larry Bogad — Associate Professor, Theatre and Dance
Today the Venice canals are a very enjoyable walk and you can see some very beautiful and desirable houses.
In 1994, he initiated an integrated social development project for the benefit of the rural people of Mysore and Mandya districts. A model, prototype organic farm based on natural and earth-friendly farming methods along with an internationally accredited farmer-training center has been setup in the 110-acre land on the banks of river Kaveri in Srirangapatam.
Colin: That’s pretty cool.
But, chances are it’ll take me a while to actually get around to finishing up the series and having the initiative to write the review. I’ve just been sooooooo busy lately!!
5. Pointing and directing for gates, forward, backward, sideways
Denmark is divided into five regions and 98 municipalities. The regions and municipalities are both led by councils elected every 4 years, but only the municipal councils have the power to levy taxes. Regional councils are responsible for health services and regional development, while the municipal councils are responsible for day care, elementary schools, and care for the elderly, culture, environment, and roads. Total government control, the Socialist dream for America.
For me and my fellow peers, I have known thousands. However, as a soon-to-be graduate from College I have witnessed a shift in many of my peer Millennials mindsets. Sure, we have been riding on the wings of LIVESTRONG bracelets for years, and self promoting ourselves to JUST DO IT as much as we can, but what happens when a generation is subjugated by being called frail and fragile. While according to Daniel Newman’s Blog that is just another myth in the mystified stereotyping of a diversified generation.
Although I took 16 pages of notes while reading this book, I will refrain from sharing all of that with you and quote only three small parts. I hope you take the time to think about each of them.
I just noticed that the directions say to preheat the oven to 325F, but I actually baked mine at 350F. Oops. (A good reason to check the cake early: if the oven is hotter, it's going to cook faster, but it doesn't necessarily mean all is lost. The cake is done when it's done; not when the timer says it is!)
Dec 4th – woke up to the sounds of a rooster and some goats. Then I did it! I took a shower African style. I made George stand on the other side of the curtain as if something was going to get me. He’s awesome! Now we’re going to eat breakfast (10:45am) and go profile some more kids!
Participants must be fluent in English, under the age of 35 and Nationals of NATO member states, Partnership for Peace countries, Mediterranean Dialogue and Istanbul Cooperation Initiative countries.
It was the least scandalous shirt ever. It even had shoulder pads. I convinced myself that maybe I could remix it into something fabulous since I’ve been feeling all crafty lately.
by the bottle, and five on draft. Chez Moeder Lambic, in the
How did you spend summertime as a child? You probably have memories of vacationing with your family, playing baseball or softball, attending summer camps, or swimming at the pool or lake.
(SO this wasn’t supposed to be about kids with cell phones. It’s about apps. I have a post in the works about kids with cell phones. Your gonna love it. I HOPE it gets a debate going. Or someone telling me I am wrong. )
Queen of Exile takes you into a magical time of queens and knights and unique, mysterious creatures. I promise you'll be intrigued from the very start by Princess Jeniah's story.
Thankfully I have more time to prepare for father’s day. My dad is more a mechanical and auto buff who thinks my crocheting is cool, but I’m not quite sure if it’s something that would really be displayed.
...or will I be doing periodic repairs?
It’s not an easy job because not everyone has the same love and endearing loyalty to “that which is not of the ordinary”.
Still I prefer the “real deal”. Or blogging, if you like.
Well here we are, the day after Christmas. Aftermath. Here. Now.
Leif: Hey, spud, why did the chicken cross the playground?
Since its founding, the organization has built more than 750 schools in developing countries, provided education to more than 55,000 children every day, established 23,000 alternative income programs and provided clean water and medical programs to hundreds of thousands of families. Free the Children runs events and youth leadership training conferences that encourage and inspire young people to get out into their local communities and ‘be the change’. Kielburger is also co-founder of “Me to We”, an innovative social enterprise, which challenges the notions of consumption and redefines the relationship between business and charity. Today, Free the Children is the world’s largest network of children helping children through education, with more than one million young people involved in programs in 45 countries.
"Get thee to social media." This is universal advice for new and newly-published authors looking to build their readership. But though it's easy to say, it's not so easy to do. For social media to work as a promotional tool, you have to know how to use it--and that does NOT mean begging people on Facebook to "like" your page, or blasting out 500 "check out my new book!" messages on Twitter. If you use social media solely for self-promotion, or if you're too obvious about the fact that you're promoting yourself, you will probably fail.
Laughing the laughter
Muslim hip hop group Mecca to Medina were among the musical acts while poetry came from Somali poet Lady S.
This piece was written during a quiet spell at work.
Jesus is constantly telling us to think in a way contrary to our fallen nature. It's difficult; we need frequent reminding. But it's the only way to internal rest. Pry your hopes off of your circumstances and put them on the Person who promises peace. Desire only Him, and you will never be disappointed. Or worried.
for the way we treat people
I’ll start with The Secret Circle, Smallville, and Charmed:
Point being that if he/they take these bears up there tomorrow, will we be packing at midnight? I won't be happy about that. Ok, maybe I will be really, really mad.
05-I'm Tore Down
I wanted to scream, just go away and leave me alone.
2011.
This is, however, coming from someone who is not a successful writer. Merely a successful editor.
“Of course it was, Sandra!” I exclaimed. “Your slender haunches could never bear the pressure!”
One day, we will cast aside all other relationships as we live for all of eternity in the only One that really matters!!!
* Mem Fox
Myra gets home and her landlord is waiting for her. She attempts to talk nonsense to him to stay off the subject, but he insists that she settle her bill. She invites him in and asks for a second to get her money together. She calls him into the bedroom and when he opens the door he finds her naked on the bed telling him "the lady, or the loot." He picks the lady.
Bible Verses/Story
A brief dialog ensued after this, as he found my remark amusing.
Since leaving office, Paterson has been a radio talk show host on station WOR in New York City.
There you have it, my dream kitchen. Demolition began December 27, and today is January 27th, 2012, so not too bad. Living without a kitchen was no fun. At all. I think I’ll write another post about all the microwave meals that were a hit/bomb from Costco.
For Toni, finding these records and allowing people access to them is not something she does only for a love of history. For her, there is a moral imperative. “Our ancestry is the sum total of our individual experiences. Because of cultural factors, there are important stories out there that haven’t been told, and will be lost forever if someone doesn’t do this work–everyone should care about preserving these records.” For some people, genealogical research might seem like the provenance of a few historically savvy dilettantes, or armchair researchers. But Toni and the researchers at Lowcountry Africana feel that everyone, regardless of race or ethnic origin, needs to know their roots. Toni likes to quote her colleague Robin Foster who says that “anyone can define you if you don’t know who you are.” Robin explains that she looks to the struggles and adversity that her forbearers faced in order to gain perspective on her own challenges. For Toni, her French-Cajun ancestry is her anchor in the world. “I treasure the recipes, stories, and heritage of my ancestors–and anyone can learn their family’s heritage if they know how and where to look.”
But it was a close-run thing for Earth. When she had almost finished gathering up her building materials, she was struck by another massive proto-planet and the resulting mess split into two chunks. The bigger part is our Earth today, and the smaller, our Moon.
the quiet grey fog rolls
He was speaking to Bernama after attending the 1Malaysia Ponggal celebrations at the MIC headquarters here today.
paper skin.
In the car, on the way back, I vomit. I see her eyes in the mirror.
Yes, I am alive in case any of you were wondering. We have been busy cleaning out 20 years of "stuff" from our house. I have to say that I am not one to keep a lot of things that I am not using. I have been known to give things away and then want them back later, but I can assure you that Hubbie has never, ever done that. He has sentimental attachments to all kinds of things, so getting him to participate in the purge has not been all that easy, but he is coming along.
I could have waited to share this cute little transformation for Monday at My Home. But I am just too impatient!
I read an interesting article last week by Tony Campolo, where he makes an important distinction between “power” and “authority.” Power is focused primarily on coercion. People who seek to bring about change through power do so by trying to impose there will or coerce people to change. Authority, on the other hand, is something that is earned. A person with authority has gained the respect of others and out of that reputation is able to call people to change.
BUT NEVER YOU FEAR! The story is actually alternating chapters of the past and present. Which, by the way, works really well. Especially since, at the beginning, we're left wondering as to why she had to make that oh-so-important decision between her family and her friends. Along with that, within the chapter, you get the two different perspectives from Peyton and Chris.
The Gleaners and I
Cameron this morning:-
Quite a few people had asked me how I was going to top my Flo costume. Well, I couldn't, Flo was probably my best costume ever! But I think I still did a good job with the Flintstones and upheld my reputation for another year, haha. :)
Is it that Heffer is no longer wanted by the Mailmen who have taken over at the Barclay Brothers’ press flagship? This would be odd, as Simon Heffer’s column continues to get massive hits and long comment threads: he is that rare animal, a respected but polarising columnist.
Dragging his bone over town. Dragging his bone over town.
Erica Ciszek came to our Journalism 456 class this morning and informed us about data visualization, the research that goes into it, and life in general.
Inflation in Brazil rose slightly more than expected in the month to mid-April, breaking with an easing trend that allowed the central bank to focus on stimulating growth by cutting interest rates to near record lows.
Linda Gerber - Death by Bikini
Weinstein points to McClary’s website for evidence that the speaker is too evangelical for the academy.
Now I have been on a super-doper health kick for a while now. Not a fad type of kick but a 'do now what you can see yourself doing a year from now' sort of approach. I have always been healthy but am determined to be happy with 'me' before the dreaded decline in hormones. I think my mum went thought menopause in her late forties. Not sure. So at 45 I am ever mindful of the road ahead and although the path is well lit, I don't want it to be rockier than it need be.
The doughnut were great...the first day. Unfortunately the next day they were dry and not so good. The bright side is that there were only FOUR DOUGHNUTS LEFT! So most of the doughnut were eaten at their best ^^ I suppose that this means that people did like them, doesn't it?
251Thy life a long, dead calm of fix'd repose;
Won’t bless the Abbot of Aberbrothok.”
I know when I watch that garbage on BRAVO that I'm watching garbage. When I finally kicked my "Real World" habit at 34, I really thought I was free.
Now, most of you will remember the 1961 TV series "The Avengers". It was a very smartly-written, funny and well-acted escapist action show featuring the adventures of British Secret Agent John Steed (Patrick Macnee), who often worked (for a couple of seasons, at least) with Emma Peel (Diana Rigg). The series itself was a hit for eight seasons and made stars of its leads, Macnee and Rigg in particular (there were many actors and roles in the series through the years, you see, but the Steed/Peel pairing seemed to be the one that people recall most fondly).
1 stick butter, softened (half cup)
One of my favorite band. ViViD★
Who taught me I can do anything
Yesterday we were all doing our school work and Nathaniel, who now knows better than to argue with me about when and how to do his school work, was busily writing out an assignment while planning out his birthday meals in a little less than a month. Hey when you’re grounded for the next 7 weeks from video games and computer games you have to find something to bring the light into your day.
I am not a counselor, I don't know how to help anyone beyond listening and sharing my story. Maybe something I have done or haven't done will help, but I think the most helpful thing I can do is offer you encouragement. I think it is important to find something positive that you can do to help yourself and if the first thing doesn't work, keep looking. Maybe my story is discouraging to you, then please look somewhere else until you find someone doing something healthy for themselves that maybe you can relate to. I did not seek counseling, but that was probably a mistake. There is no shame in doing so. Reach out and keep reaching out. It most certainly, will not be easy, but easy or not, you have to fight for what you want, for what matters to you.
On a fence.
However, most of us tend to take it too far. With unemployment still at a totally unacceptable rate, many people are finding it harder every day to pay their bills. I know people who are choosing between food and their car payment, between heat and medical care. So, is the fight or flight response helpful with these situations? For the most part, no.
I can’t recommend Whakarewarewa village highly enough if you are visiting Rotorua, and especially if you have young children with you - being in a living village made for a unique cultural experience, and the tour was incredibly interesting and educational. Robert was an excellent tour guide, peppering our visit with little tidbits of information which added to the overall experience and really left us feeling like we’d had an insight into life in the thermal village. With the show included in general entry, the visit was excellent value at $30 each for the adults and two year olds go free. Most of the other cultural performances that I looked into were topping the $100 per person mark (including dinner) and would probably have been a bit too long and late to suit our needs with a toddler in tow.
She never does that.
We all know a Lazarus. He’s the guy with the cardboard sign. The lady with the backpack. It’s the orphan with the stomach bloated by hunger. In our world we come across Lazarus so often that we can become blind to him. We make excuses for our behavior and place the responsibility on their behavior. We say we aren’t rich, but Lazarus would trade lives with us any day.
Now - time to get on with writing the books....
This past week I gave Klein two extra days off because we've been trailering out a lot lately and I wanted to just give her those two extra days to just relax. But we did work hard on the days we did work this week.
Publisher: Signet Eclipse
I think I originally got this recipe from Taste of Home Magazine. This is the third time I've made it and I would like to share my experiences. First of all, I would like to say, prepare your pan according to the recipe and not the cake mix box.
TWSBI inkwells come in several colors, Red, Blue, Green, Purple, Silver, and Orange. For about $25 a piece you can pick up one or several for all your favorite inks. The cap and secondary part is made of anodized aluminum, highly wear and corrosion resistant.
Sure, we have Sephora, the beauty departments at Neiman and Nordstrom, local brands, and even good old Longs Drugs, but there's something about the browsing appeal of Bath & Body Works that just can't be beat. Copious coupons, sales, and frequent new launches mean you can walk in there in the worst mood ever, spend all of $35 and leave with a huge bag of new goodies to lift your spirits.
Oct 4 1862 ... Rose very early - after dirty breakfast, paid our dirty bill of $5.00 & left - won't stop there again, I guess...
And then there are the tools needed for writing books. Those tremendous books The Odyssey and The Iliad, said to be written by Homer and credited to him on many a book cover, were of course handed down through word of mouth for generations before they were written down. How do we know this? Well Homer was said to be blind. But they were such powerful stories that eventually someone wrote them down for posterity.
When a bird flew in through the French doors, quick to recognise its mistake;
I'm also really stressed out! ha! I have so much to do and so little time to do it in...and I haven't even met the new sisters that just moved into our Relief Society. I met one tonight...but there are about 9 others!
Rnd 7: ch 3, dc in next 11 dc, 2 dc in next dc, *dc in next 12 dc, 2 dc in next dc; repeat from* around to last 2 dc; dc in last 2 dc; join with sl st to 1st dc (58 dc)
Intrepid Gio’s World member, Steve, called the Congressional Ethics Oversight Committee to lodge an ethics complaint against repeated liar, Congresswoman & Speaker of the House Nancy Pelosi. The committee responded by sending Steve a tsunami of paperwork. Holy Cow! Our government sure does not want to make it easy for citizens, The People, to lodge complaints against their elected representatives!
I'm having one of those periods where I'm not loving how I look.
Bonus: Could anyone in this new generation live a happy life? Who would you bet on and why?
King: Then say hello to death, my dear, for you will spend eternity with him. General Najiya, you have sworn an oath to my kingdom, I presume that you would not forsake it for a mere woman?
Keeping up with my New Years resolution of daily random acts of kindness. Have missed a few days here and there but have tried to "double up" the following days and I think I'm ahead. I try and keep it simple, the kind of stuff anyone could do. And along the way here and there I keep looking for really fun ways to make someone's day. Some entries from my "Random Acts 2010 Journal"..........
230How glowing guilt exalts the keen delight!
This recipe book is going back in the “to go” box!
Machine Description
I will stick to growing a few veg in my garden though!
This story came to me from Elizabeth Katz, who works with my husband at Oglethorpe University. Her new blog on motherhood is perky and fun (http://momsarehuman.blogspot.com). This story, unfortunately, is not.
This year, I'm observing Lent. I've never done it before, (as far as I can remember) despite the fact that I classified myself as a Catholic growing up. But we didn't really attend much, just on holidays. I think one year, I insisted on going every week, but I don't ever remember observing Lent. And now that I'm Foursquare (Protestant), I'm going to try it for the first time.
Thought on styling
How did you spend the holiday?
Zig says “The way you start and end your child’s day is extremely important because if the day is started and ended properly, the time in between will go much better”. This made a lot of sense, because when I reflected on the other times that I’m gentle and would kiss him and we giggle together in the mornings, things flow sooo much easier.
Hold your line.
It’s only just past 7 a.m. and today already has the makings of “one of those days”.
My Christmas wish is for the living and the spirits to meet once more, even for a few hours.
Mom’s creation!
I bought him a new one that even has a spongy handle. He told me it wouldn't do.
Soon her husband is home
On behalf of:
Will that get me dates?
If the image of Jefferson politics is to ever recover, the highly questionable expenditure of $340,000 to Mr. Bubbles Carwash needs a thorough cleansing.
Code : CA 050
We ate more than two reasonable people should…But then again, who needs to be reasonable?
Then onward I sped in the battle, the even-contested battle,
Organize and label all electronic cords, parts, etc!!
Mother (Albert Brooks & Monica Johnson)
…ARKLATEX SWWD TO PARTS OF SOUTH CENTRAL AND SW TX…
I don't know that because of this tea, or considering all my steps to heal myself, but today I coughed less, at least I didn't cough every hour, but I am still coughing... and the cleaning didn't help.. :)) the dust, which somehow covered my flat and I had to clean up since tomorrow 2 of my friends will visit me, got me to cough. I had to admit, that I neglected the flat, so now I have many things to do, or I would have, but I gave up after a big cough attack, the most relevant spaces are clean ... I really admired my carpet after I hoovered and brushed it, beautifully clean... maybe I should do it frequently... :D .. khm...
SH: The role of the male gold digger is not to do any hand washing.
"Fashioning just cause is our VIVE. What's yours?"
Remember the challenge Fun Things To Do In The Fall is still running
So, to all the those parents who have experienced the horror of miscarriage and still birth I would like to say that you are incredible, strong and I have so much respect for you. I don’t know how you get through it, deal with it and live with it – but you do and you are inspiring.
Stage two: After 20 minutes, take out the potatoes, add in the button mushrooms and an extra tbsp each of olive oil and balsamic vinegar. Give everything a good stir around, and then pop back in the oven. Then take out the grill pan, and lay out the plaice on it. Spread a little butter/margarine over each slice, sprinkle over a little lemon juice (about 1 tbsp overall), season and put in the grill. Leave for 12-15 minutes.
So please enjoy artLedge's Number 4 TOP TEN List...
Saturday rolled around and several members met at my house for the Spiked Beer Tasting. Normally, would never subject ourselves to drinking bad beer, but in the name of science, we carried on. Jarrett walked us through each spike, helping us identify what we were tasting and what caused each off flavor. And because we all homebrew, there was talk of a collaborative beer to only be known as "Nanna".
-The Vandals
Suffer and Pain isn’t my favorite game.Crying on my pillow either.I am not familiar with the term “depression” I never lost my self control.Yet lately I tend to believe all that could relief the burden of my soul and makes me wonder.. When did I change so much.Worse than that,Why did I feel the need to change so much?
AVAILABLE FOR WORLDWIDE PRE-ORDER STARTING TODAY
So while employers do understand when we move to greener pastures, they are unlikely to be sympathetic to you if you decide to badmouth them on your way out.
I think the lesson to myself is to be more confident and praise God for what he has given me. I need to spend LESS time picking apart the body he gave me and spend MORE time thanking him for all the blessings he has given me.
What struck me first was the fact that he showed no emotion. The entire time we stood there his facial expression never changed. Because of his sunglasses you never knew in which direction his eyes were focused. He had also painted his entire body silver, giving off the sense of coldness. I thought of the Tin Man, from The Wizard of Oz, who has no heart and cannot feel. Why was this guy here? For the money? How does it feel to have people gawking at you for hours at a time? Or, did he simply view himself as a performer, an artist?
I asked my brother if he is interested to watch this maybe on the weekend of Princess birthday, he says OK. We considering which TGV to watch, and finally decided on Sunway Pyramid. I have no idea what is the timing of the show, therefore make it on a weekend when we can have the whole day in Sunway for shopping and movie.
An important read from Arise For Social Justice, a “Western MA low-income rights organization which believes we have the right to speak for ourselves. Our members are poor, homeless, at-risk, working, unemployed & people pushed to the side by society. We organize!: voting rights, housing, homelessness, health care, criminal injustice & more!”
Brush Teeth (with help)
Watch out for disintegration or collapse of Cities, large-scale structures, bridges, tunnels, power plants… , e.g., collapse of China’s Three Gorges Dam in the next two to three years.
Bessings to you all, and I'll be back next week!
"Making your community safe in terms of both violent crimes and property crimes involves not only pronouncing appropriately long sentences, but also in rehabilitating those people who can be rehabilitated," Krocker said. "A lot of us are working a lot harder at that."Good news, indeed. A big chunk of the decline stems from the DA's new policy on how to charge drug paraphernalia, which has drawn heat from police unions but praise from nearly every other corner of the justice system. (Clearly the change hasn't spawned some great crime wave.) But the story also mentions other initiatives that contributed to the jail population decline:
This time last year we told you about The Gordon Biersch Brewing Company's plans to open up a new brewpub location at the Salt lake International Airport. At first we thought, if your not traveling through the airport, it's likely you won't be having their beer. Luckily that is not the case.
Drawn from the life and lifestyle of our Savior, The Jesus Life offers eight practical ways to truly experience the life Christ promised. Each chapter will show readers how to follow the example that Jesus modeled throughout his life including:
It's time.
How cool is this? There's an antique-looking brad holding everything together at the top . . . and each layer swivels! The middle layer has a fun sentiment (from my stash) and an image of a chicken (SU).
Temporarily, briefly, it happens: you experience a deeper universal love and a complete acceptance that can sometimes shine through, even in an otherwise egoic relationship. If surrender is not sustained, however, it gets covered up again with the old egoic patterns. So, I’m not saying that the deeper, true love cannot be present occasionally, even in a normal love / hate relationship. But it is rare and usually short-lived.
Ok that’s it, till next update!
Index Head
We have two trees up this year. Our main tree in the living room and a mini tree in the family room that has the 20 Paws ornaments...of course they all have their own!
POSTMA MJ, JANSEMA P, VAN GENUGTEN ML, HEIJNEN MA, JAGER JC, DE JONG-VAN DEN BERG LT. Pharmacoeconomics of influenza vaccination for healthy working adults. Drugs 2002; 62: 1013-1024.
What inspired you to write this particular book?
“Islamic Thought,” Abdullah Saeed. Taylor & Francis, 2007.
Can you imagine parenting a kid who is scary brilliant, a kid whose IQ far surpasses your own before he’s 9-years-old? It must have been difficult and a little frightening to try to keep their son from blowing up the house and neighborhood while simultaneously nurturing his insatiable obsession with nuclear energy. It’s easy to see why some parents would try to curb, redirect or even forbid it, but Taylor’s mother took him to antique stores in search of radium-dial alarm clocks, thorium lantern mantles and uranium-glazed Fiesta plates. Quite a story.
So in the first draft of “Down and Out in the Mushroom Kingdom”, I had little humorous ads that went between the four main sections of the story, as a way of indicating chapter breaks. I guess I got the idea from Gaiman’s story “A Study in Emerald”, which has some hilarious fake Victorian advertisements in between the main sections of the story (my favorite one is about V. Tepes– Professional Exsanguinator!!). In any case, I tried doing something similar to that while I was writing DaOitMK.
5-5-2012
Henry and Susan Samueli
At the time, I couldn’t exactly pinpoint the precise reasons – I just knew that that name pointed to the Triune God and I wanted to spend the rest of my life getting to know, love and serve better the Father, Son and Holy Spirit.
Anonymous then calls on the people to “take their country back.”
How much you enjoy the best mexico vacation destinations. For the most pristine holiday destinations in Europe and as such has its own specific amenities and these range anywhere from screened lanai, pool, Jacuzzi, fully equipped for it. You'll find clubs and activities to keep everyone busy. Indulge yourself with a cemetery that dates back to 19th century. Saint Irene is an older town and most rental cabins are modern and well taken care of.
I am pronouncing the same blessing on all my children, you will call one fellow one thousand will answer you.
Mr. Hite and his three comrades avoided that fate, surviving more than three years in the Japanese prison before eventually being liberated by Allied forces as the war came to a close.
The penguin is from the Cincinnati Zoo, and while on a drive Saturday morning, we decided that it would be a great way to spend the day, and maybe even get to see this adorable penguin for ourselves.
Similarly Allah (swt) disapproved of those who abandoned Jihad (i.e. they did not go for Jihad) and attributed to them hypocrisy and disease in their hearts, and threatened (all) those who remain behind from Jihad and sit (at home) with horrible punishment. He (Allah swt) accused them with the most ugly descriptions, rebuked them for their cowardice and spoke against them (about their weakness and their remaining behind) as He said:
Hope Not Hate
for on this moments sweet sweet sigh
I woke up to let the dogs out at 5 a.m. So I was already aware of the snow that started falling in the early morning hours. Leo hates snow. So I wish I'd had time to soften the blow for him before he stepped out of the dark cocoon of our master bedroom into the bright living room and saw the blanket of white outside. But oh well. He's a big boy. He can handle it!
It was a great day....Kaitlyn knows she is loved by many and we all are so happy to celebrate the wonderful day she became part of our family and such a special part of our lives. WE LOVE YOU KAITLYN!!!
Sadly, I have to admit a failure, but I don’t see it as a bad thing. An unexpected development has forced me to push back a deadline, but I believe it will be for the best in the long run. Sometimes, it’s all about keeping my eye on the big picture.
I know I should wait and make them do it, but quite honestly I just played out the entire conversation in my brain and I exhausted myself just thinking about it so I caved and took care of it myself.
3Arts has worked closely with the city and state to explore every possible funding option to restore its deteriorating building to house an affordable artist community and public art center. This difficult decision was made after the organization learned that approximately $5.5 million of the anticipated public funds, which it had counted on to initiate the planned renovation and restoration, would not be forthcoming.
Do you have a favourite book you have written?
St. Peter replied, “We sent you three boats and a helicopter!”
If you’ve read this far, you really should just read the whole thing.
Players may also build buildings in the city, which become extra action spaces but typically provide a bonus to whoever “owns” the building when used. The exact buildings which turn up in the game are randomised, too, so there’s an element of chance and uncertainty to what is coming up rather than the more predictable turn order of Agricola.
Ok, I guess I added more movie that I watch recently…actually not too recent…huhu…but I’m just updated it now…cause of internet problem in my dorm…huhu…
3. Relationships – Academic research shows that what helps things “stick” is the emotional connection that the person makes with the task at hand. They need to make that connection for it to find a place in their memory. Building relationships is a way to build those connections and make them stick. When people are a part of their learning or the process, it is more likely to stay with them.
A short section of this falaj has been restored and turned into a little park and picnic area about 7km north of Nizwa. Only about 200 meters of falaj are visible before the channel disappears underground at either end.
My carafe has a lovely, err, tannish tint to it these days. There are occasionally individual coffee grounds that stick to the bottom. The coffee rings that usually show up on your desktop? They’re at the bottom of my carafe. I figure brewing a pot of very hot coffee scalds away the badness (I don’t know, mold spores?) and the seasoned pot adds, umm, irony? I haven’t been covering it with aluminum foil, but I have been doing the smear-it-with-oil thing. I don’t use oil, I use Jameson, but seems to work.
It seems to me that all they’ve done is revert to type, given the incumbents a kicking and transferred their votes to the other main opposition party or stayed at home and watched Big Brother. Lord knows there were enough alternatives on the ballot paper for some constructive protest voting apart from the BNP. It’s an opportunity lost and one that we may all live to regret. It wasn’t just Labour politicians with their snouts in the trough but I’ve got a funny feeling that years down the line the moat-cleaning and duck islands will be forever linked with Labour, just like the three-day week of the early Seventies is.
Stuffing – store bought (optional)
Independent Women?
In a large wide saute pan with 2 to 3-inch sides, heat the oil over medium-high heat. When the oil is hot but not smoking, add the thighs and brown well on both sides, about 6 minutes. Remove the chicken from the pan and set aside.
Imagine….there’s a rope that is as long as you can see and beyond…this rope is a representation of your life as a timeline….it goes on and on and on and on….there is a 5cm red marking on the rope this if your time on earth.
“Karen, you’re always so good to remind us about manners.” I said and rolled my eyes. Since she wrote that book, she thinks she is the end all be all on manners.
Fortunately, I did have everything I needed for this recipe from Cook's Illustrated - well, mostly. I substituted frozen blueberries for fresh since there was only a handful left in my fridge. They worked perfectly - just dump them into a strainer, rinse until the water runs clear and dry on a paper towel-lined plate. These pancakes would be perfect for a lazy weekend morning - whipping them up is as easy as combining dry ingredients in one bowl, wet ingredients in another, and then mixing them both together. The pancakes are thick and fluffy with sweet pops of flavor in each bite from the blueberries. They definitely satisfied my craving, and added bonus - there were leftovers to stick in the freezer for another day!
Penny Arcade has a comic up bemoaning the need for those who with the installer already in our possession having to wait for physical boxes to catch up via the old school brick and mortar distribution system. The comic wraps up with an analogy (what, is May national bad analogy month?) that compares the digital vs. physical distribution conflict to making automobiles drive slower so as not to hurt the feelings of horses.
INS
No 2 of my 'Versatile Blogger' recommendations goes to lovely Meg Slater for Project 365. She takes great and diverse photos and counts down each day in her year . She is always quirky and interesting. I find the format a bit difficult to use but there's no doubting that the girl has style!
And they’re curious now, wondering how we turned out
Meanwhile, Firefly is convinced to break her vigil at her dead master’s grave by a handsome wolf-dog, Swift Lightning. Hedging their bets with the humans, Firefly and Swift Lightning follow and eventually gain the acceptance of Jean and Gaston, despite the latter’s prejudices against Swift Lightning’s wild blood.
That’s okay though. ANNNNNDDDD..it’s National Volunteer Month, so I have been busy, busy promoting and doing interviews.
In John 13:5, He even washes the feet of His disciples: “After that, he poured water into a basin and began to wash his disciples’ feet, drying them with the towel that was wrapped around him.” Follow His example of humility today. Ask Him to guide you in living a life that honors Him.
I definitely stitched, using some old embroidery floss from making friendship bracelets. I also have the metal letters below from my stash... it took me a while to figure out a title I could make with the letters I have left (can't believe I had two s left!). Finally the green and yellow cardstock are stash items. I know, you're asking... where is the yellow cardstock? Well, its the scalloped border and I covered it with Walnut stain distress ink, Tattered Angels leather glimmermist and some green glimmer glam. I also distressed the green cardstock, the photos and the journalling card (Bo Bunny).
brotherhood – that each Muslim woman is my sister, each man is my brother, and together, we are one large body who must protect each other. In other words, I couldn’t see these things beings done to my brothers & sisters – including by America – and remain neutral. My sympathy for the oppressed continued, but was now more personal, as was my respect for those defending them.
Did I mention a new feature??? I sure did! I have been industrious here on my day off and decided it was time to reward my faithful customers, so in addition to my Customer Rewards Program, I have a new feature, that will change weekly. It is a Buy 3 Get One Free! (I love Free!) This week the stamp up for the special is Poinsettia Frame:
Hagan lives near but not in the Atlantic Yards footprint; she suggested to Galinsky that one of the condo owners (as opposed to business owners or renters) seemed likely to resist Ratner’s buyout offer. “She said, ‘There’s this one guy, Dan Goldstein, I think you should meet him… he’s a fighter.’” And Galinsky and Goldstein were already friendly.
M: Sometimes I notice a competition between new currents that allow more ample movements, where the dancers use more space, and those who defend traditional tango with a closed embrace.
No point in getting in a wax...
All 'terms and conditions' of the challenge are available on the T's and C's page of this blog. (just click the tab)
I also reckon this would be a great space for a massive techno party…. just my opinion though
But I'm doing pretty well considering. I'm only a couple of days behind. I still need to clean a room this week, clean out my medicine cabinet, and hang a piece of artwork. I stopped on the way home from work today (my first day in my own city this week!) and got some flowers.
If you haven’t seen this video yet, check it out and you will come to love Ethan Walmark, a six-year-old boy, displaying his piano-playing talent.
I'm picking up my younger sister who is coming in from San Francisco tonight. Tomorrow we will spend the day and night up at my older sister's house. I'm so looking forward to spending time with them. We are going to do fun stuff that sisters do like shop, eat, talk, hang out and watch teen vampire movies. Yep, we're finally going to go see Breaking Dawn. Tomorrow also marks the official start of my holiday vacation. I don't go back to work until Jan 3rd. For the next 13 days I will be a Lady of Leisure. My job totally shuts down for the holidays and we don't even have to use vacation time. My time will be all my own to do with whatever I please. I've felt so tired and ragged like I always do towards the end of a long year so I really, really REALLY need this right about now. I am free!! And it feels great.
Get as much as you can ready over the summer. Trust me, I LOVE my summer vacation! But I spend a lot of it preparing for the upcoming school year. With two kids at home, I can't get to school as early as I'd like or stay as late as I'd like, so I make up for it by doing a lot over the summer.
1 Cor 11:11NLT But among the Lord’s people, women are not independent of men, and men are not independent of women.
One Singaporean tuning in to Class 95 morning show today at 9am was shocked when he heard its host ‘The Flying Dutchman’ aka Mark van Cuylenburg giving a lecture to Singaporeans which goes something like this:
In the eighteenth Psalm David speaks much about the LORD, His way, His word, trusting Him, and in the verse for which the title comes he has written for all time and eternity;
14. Kai is good at dancing, he can dance Ballet, Jazz, Hip Hop, Popping, Locking Dance as well.
rhythming her hips
sometimes without fighting back.
Between these brownies, my own pick of Alsatian Apple Tart this week (yay!), and National Bundt Day, a 9x13" pan of brownies was not in the cards for me. So I quartered the recipe and made the brownies in my trusty miniature springform pan. I know I was supposed to use fancy, expensive chocolate, but for 2.25 ounces, I figured Ghirardhelli 70% would do just fine.
So, I meant to write something about finding the time to work on your amateur games, but I've been side-tracked by Starcraft 2. Now I have my new computer, I've been playing it pretty much non-stop; the only time I haven't been playing it is when I've been at work or eating or something...
For the misdemeanor outlaw, chased an’ cheated by pursuit
So many questions, so much angst. I know I’m not alone in this. Please, Town Meeting people, do us all a favor and pass free, full-day kindergarten so we all know where we stand.
Here are some of the questions I'd love to see people contribute answers to in the comments box or via email:
While we're not finished quite yet, things are starting to wrap up after one very big year, only to be followed by a 2012 that's even more jam packed. Watch this space, we have some serious surprises up our sleeve!
Our friend Gina and her kids loaned us some books, so we read the story of the Rabbit in the moon. After eating some candy, we enjoyed the potluck. Mmmm, yummy food!
Personally speaking, the key is not to represent any one particular brand (and end up looking like a store mannequin) but to create your own style by mixing well known with lesser known designers and often adding a touch of vintage.
Unfortunately this country seems to have forgotten the meaning of Memorial Day. It seems the purpose has been lost, and many Americans think it is a day to remember all of our dead, not just those lost in war. Or, even worse, it is just the official start of summer and the first day of barbeque season. Our reverence for those who have fallen in service to their country has dimmed over the decades, starting with our nearly forgotten Korean conflict. Observances really started to wane during the Vietnam war era, when it was much easier for radicals to blame drafted soldiers for the violence than the democratic leadership that ramped up operations in the first place. In fact, the day had so lost its meaning that Congress passed the "National Moment of Remembrance" resolution in 2000, which calls for all Americans to offer a moment of silence at 3pm on Memorial Day to honor our war dead.
Q: What to give up for Lent?
“That was the only time I spent with my parents at Taos Pueblo,” she said. “I moved to Taos 10 years ago and it’s so extraordinary to be there on Christmas Eve.”
